Finally, this designer used a lot of clear neutrals in her rooms. I am a bit biased - she's one of my favorite design bloggers and is totally the reason I'm attracted to browns and greens lately. But her neutrals are all definitely tan or beige. Her greens are definitely Kelly or grass. It's not an overly bright room, but it's still very cheerful and happy.
It would be a waste to throw away a good stainless steel kettle just because the whisle is not working. Actually replacement parts for the whistle are sold by some vendors but finding a matching one is a real headache.
Western Oregon sent Sara Tucholsky to the plate. With two runners on base she hit a home run – the first one of her career. She was so jubilant that she forgot to step on first base. Realizing her mistake, she spun around so quickly that she tore her ACL in her knee. As she lay writhing in pain, her teammates were helpless. If they touched her, that would constitute assisting a base runner and she would be called out.
So I racked my brains out trying to decide
The chairs do dry fast with all the rain we have had.
We ended up closing even earlier than originally intended. Overall, my experience was completely undramatic. Even though I was outside at the time all of the vandalism was happening, I was completely oblivious. Nothing even remotely happened during my commute home, and now I’m so far removed from the protests.
I want to say how appreciative I am to have received such high regards and genuine, heartfelt advice responding to my post last week announcing my retirement from the Detroit Fire Department. My last day is this coming Friday. Those are heavy words for me to carry. My son Josh and I will be riding Engine 23 together that last day on the job. What a rare pride I take away having such a fine young man call me Dad. We have chalked up many long nights together only to meet the next morning, smelling of smoke, for our ritual, a peaceful drive around Belle Isle clicking bird pictures. How I shall miss those blessed conversations!
He is the way to heaven
Does the Antrim Guardian not consider him more controversial?
The tree is going up this weekend, pressies are starting to be wrapped.... did somebody say Christmas?
Refrigerate at least 2 hours, until set, and remove fudge from pan using foil. Cut into squares, and store leftovers in airtight container in refrigerator.
"Seriously?" I ask. "What's up? Is everything okay?"
Clearly this has to be assembled early in the day, but that’s the beauty of it. When you are freshly out of bed, having your coffee and planning your day, this can be thrown together and you’ve finished the dinner preparation for the day.
Pearls have been around for a very long time. Some fossilized pearls are over 200 million years old - and most amazingly, the well preserved specimens still retain their shine and lustre. Understandably, as pearls go, the value of such specimens are considerably compounded by the fact that they are fossils as well. Humans have been obsessed with the beauty of pearls since millennia. There are numerous records dating back several centuries B.C., speaking of the beauty of pearls, their use in jewellery and as highly precious commodities.
Alright so I have this dilemma. I’m actually telling people who know me not to buy my book or read it…yeah backwards I know. But here is the problem. I don’t want them comparing my main character, her actions and all around personality to me. I don’t want them to see my face when reading about a love scene or wonder if I’d ever go as far as to actually throw a person down a flight of stairs.
I think its the perfect way to get the mojo going. I also realised that sketches makes me go past my own comfort zones(its a really tiny zone). They inspire me and give me new ideas that i wouldnt even have tought about normally.
This panel seeks papers on how Brecht used visual elements to transform productions into multimedia events and how his radio/media theory reveals possibilities and risks in the digital age. 200-word abstracts by 16 March 2011; Kristopher Imbrigotta (imbrigotta@wisc.edu) and Henning Wrage (hwrage@wisc.edu).
And, as we make Jesus Lord over every area of our lives and obey His commandments, He is high and lifted up – exalted for all to see (John 14:21 &23). Jesus raises us up with Him by the same power that raised Him from the dead. This is why we take communion – to remember that Jesus’ death and resurrection are what made a way for us to be united with Him. And, in a mysterious way that I can neither understand nor describe, we are taken deeper into communion – made one. We are moving toward complete unity in Christ through His Spirit. We are being transformed – becoming the body of Christ. Hallelujah!!
An ultra decked-out tree sits outside the house as well, brightly sparkling in Christmas cheer. The door is embossed with a plaid folder to somewhat mimic a carved wood design, while the frame is embossed with tiny dots for added texture. This entire base is the store from the Sweet Tooth Boxes cartridge, slightly altered to become a house. I cut off the bottom because Santa didn't leave cupcakes or treats as the Cricut cut is intended. Let's take a peek inside, shall we? Instead of sweets, Santa's gift is...
He sent her a text and told her ”the relationship is over.” ‘
I eat biscuits and wait for a clue
Here is the best/worst video of all time with my real-time thoughts below:
My Next song, is un chant d'amour, a song of lurve,
This morning Carla had this post about playing it forward handmade, how could I pass on this!!! See the rules below to get in on some fun. Be one of the first 3 to post on my blog that you want to play along. Copy and paste the following. Thanks CARLA for passing this on!!!
03 Don't Back Down
Karen Altfest, executive vice president of Altfest Personal Wealth Management, said women often seek out female advisers because they feel more comfortable talking to another woman. For example, she’s had a client call from a carpet store to ask what how much she should pay for a Persian rug, something she might feel uneasy asking a male adviser.
Nigel
THE DAY OF:
I'm reading a couple of books at once. Okay, I never just read one, but I'm sure that's been apparent in the past.
The collapse of modern industrial society has 14 parts, each with a
There are two book bloggers. Over time, among others, these bloggers comment on each other's posts. Along with others, they chat on Twitter. They may bump into each other at author/publishing events, or go along to blogger meet-ups and they chat. About books; characters, authors, recommendations, etc etc. They're not the bestest of buddies, but they know each other, they have conversations, and they get on. Skip to several months/years down the line, and one of those bloggers has a book published. The other blogger receives a review copy from the publisher.
Domestic violence includes assaults, woundings, violence against the person, can include sexual crimes, can result in acts endangering life such as poisoning and can result in death. According to Homicide Statistics, 1998, every week two women are killed by their current or former partners. In 2008, domestic violence still claims up to two lives a week. Confirmed by statistics, domestic violence is gendered violence.
Day 8 24/3/2012 (Saturday)
To get a closer look at it you can click on either image. I lost track of how long it took me create it; but I can't really complain, I love how it turned out.
ADR said let’s give these people what they want….John Cena Vs Ricardo Rodriguez.
So there we were, the entire Authorblog clan, dining out with close friends at Bertucci's in Long Island. It was late in the evening, we'd all had a long day, but we reckoned we could all fit in some pizza (most of us) or pasta (some of us).
And, my wake up call to cut it out came today when I was driving the kids to the bookstore. The light turned red, and Carson exclaims from the backseat, "F*ck*ng Light!"
Claudia Moscovici, The Seducer: A Novel
This looked like a place Principal Sal would make his transactions. The houses on both sides of the street were decrepit colors of white yellow and pink. No white-picket fences or crisp cut grass with garden gnomes. Adrien’s car door opened and he jumped out with a huge back pack that he carried whenever he was at school, and a skate board. He closed the door and lit a cigarette and took one long drag, then flicked it to the ground.
1 lb. carrots, grated
There is no real evidence that Berns actually set foot on Machu Picchu but from his map it seems clear that he was aware of its existence. He had lived in the area for many years and must have heard about the ruins from other landowners and inhabitants. And if he was interested in ransacking ruins in order to find their hidden treasures surely he would have investigated the site. This may well explain the lack of valuable items found at Machu Picchu by Bingham and his party. There is one person for which there is definite proof that he visited Machu Picchu before Hiram Bingham. This is the Peruvian Agustin Lizárraga, a muleteer from Cuzco who , in charcoal, wrote his surname and the year 1902 onto a rock at Machu Picchu where it was later found by Bingham. Lizárraga was accompanied on his journey, on 14th July 1902 (almost ten years to the day before Bingham’s visit) by Gabino Sanchez (from the Caicay district) and Enrique Palma. All three of them were agricultural workers on the Colpani estate in the district of San Miguel and also had the task of taking care of all the bridges over the Urubamba river between Cuzco and Quillabamba. Lizárraga was born in the town of Mollapata and had lived in the nearby valley for over thirty years but, apart from writing his name on the rock, made no mention of his visit and as he was only a simple peasant and not a historian or explorer no-one would have probably taken much notice if he had done so. His party was only interested in Machu Picchu for the treasures that may have been hidden beneath the vegetation.
I just love how the urns turned out and of course I am not done with them, so come by and see what I add to these lovelies next. Thanks for stopping by and I LOVE to HEAR from you, so leave a comment. Have a great weekend.
The Sabra and Chatila massacre of Palestinians by Israel's militia allies in 1982 doomed Israel's 1982 invasion.
When you need to be present in this moment. Right now:
However, I hope you are in heaven and got the seventy-two virgins? Hope they are all girls. Enjoy! Psykes! You fking hypocrite, hope you rotten in hell forever. Hey by the way can you blow up the hell for me?
I got my call. Pretty soon ill have a year and then it’s just a countdown not up he he. I know i know stop looking so far in advance but I can’t help it I got really trunky this week. My ZL and DL both went
Can it be done? Is there a magical store in Toronto where I can walk in and see my entire condo before me, totally furnished and within a reasonable budget? Sigh. Honest Ed’s here I come.
For many years I have wanted to be a journalist one way or the other. I imagined working on a top newspaper or magazine reporting on world events or, as I had planned for many years, reporting on football matches.
I know I am new at this but I am going to try to approach this whole IEP thing with a positive attitude. I have heard so many horror stories and the feeling of "us verse them" at the table. Why, I so naively ask, does it have to be this way? I know the schools come to the table worrying about bottom lines and wondering how they are going to provide services while the current state of our education system is already lacking in resources. Well, I am going to come to the table with a remember "we are on the same team" approach. I am a parent willing to do everything I can from the home side to help Kristen succeed, so I am hoping the "us" side will then be open and willing to do everything they can too. Naive, maybe, but I will be praying about it. You might be thinking I am crazy in my approach, but many have thought that way about me in the past five years already with some of my choices regarding Kristen. My crazy nontraditional approach has worked for us so far...so I will keep on my "crazy" path.
Slowly, I have self-inflicted privacy erosion. When I Google myself, I’m startled with the amount of information I have revealed. The erosion probably started with my blog, which harkens back to May 2003. That’s about nine years of stuff that I can’t remember writing, but likely reveals a whole lot about me. Then three years ago, I got on Facebook. The invites from my real friends poured in. At first, it was fun. The older I get, the busier I am, the less I want to drive all around L.A. to see friends. It was like a wonderful window into the world of people I know well. Then it was a window into the world of people I know less well, but find humorous for some reason. Then it was a window into the world of people I knew from high school and college. It even, unfortunately, became a window into a world of annoying or shamelessly self-promoting people I now mostly block. Which is what real life is about, isn’t it? Growing up gives you the ability to restrict contact with some people, while expanding contact with others. It’s called a filter—and I want it back.
On winter solstice this year, December 21st, the longest night in the northern hemisphere will be graced not only by a full moon but a total lunar eclipse at 8:14am GMT — 00:14am Pacific time.
I then had my kiddos work on this worksheet to accompany the chart:
baked bacon and spinach stuffed tomatoes
how dreamy is this garden? to anyone that is planning to visit vienna, stadtpark is a must see!
Ha ha ha…wish I could have watched! Brasilian Novellas are
STAND YOUR GROUND will be the subject of a local Q-and-A here in Greenville at the Reedy River Missionary Baptist Church, Monday night, 6pm. People like me, who don't quite understand all of the particulars, will be able to ask Rep. Sellers questions in person. What is the difference between repeal of the entire PPPA and modifying the "Stand Your Ground" section? How is this any different from the existing "Castle doctrine"? This is your chance to learn! Be there or be square. Hope everyone with questions will suit up and show up, and ask those questions.
Of daring should be still to dare.
01 Transmission
“I hope I could see a glimpse of the one guilty of the crime of sending me goosebumps and butterflies in my stomach for three years.”
Remember, my first book is set in my home town. I need all my other books to have the same level of detail or else I’ve failed.
Okay so It's been a while I know.....sorry *blush* ...no excuses really except work and life getting in the way really. But I'm sat here fit to burst with excitement .......why ? Ooooooooooooooooooo well you know it's not every day an artist whose talent you have admired for a while agrees to share his work with you. It never ceases to amaze me where blog hopping can lead you and one day I stumbled across Ludo's blog, a lovely French artist....see here. It was not long after I'd watched Coraline and his work has that feel to it. Suffice to say I'm a huge fan and I decided to make a connection on FB with him. Soooooooooo one day I thought "Hmmmmmmmm I wonder if he would agree to sharing his work to use as a digi stamp....you know that old saying " If you dont ask you dont get " lol.
Now, this set is aimed at new players. Something I’m most definitely not. The reasons for getting this beyond the obsessive collector syndrome are several. First, you get an amazing plastic Fellowship of the Ring. And to be honest, some of the models are the best representation of the characters so far. I specially like Gandalf, Sam, and Boromir. You also get some amazing scenery. The pillars are the weakest of all, but the rest of the little details plus Balin’s tomb are just amazing. Finally, you get 24 more gobbos. You can never have enough goblins, I tell ya. Oh yeah, you also get the freaking rulebook as well!!
Observe, great King, I am not greedy
One day in a rage Ruth 'runs away'. She tires after 3 miles or so and ends up sleeping in a cold empty church. In the morning she is found by the clergyman and he shares the gospel with her. That the beginning of her journey of following the Good Shepherd. She returns home and apologizes to her aunt for her behavior and for running away. She diligently begins reading her Bible and starts to learn to heed the voice of the Shepherd when the temptation of laziness or anger came up. With work she becomes a new girl and everyone notices the difference in her life.
I have some fun items that are currently Works In Progress!
His relentless commitment to the struggles of the poor and oppressed was acknowledged on 25 Oct 2008, when Selbourne Street was renamed Reverend Sam Buti street and in 2010 when Unisa confered upon him an honorary doctorate.
Bruschetta–another favorite at my home. I often make this Italian-inspired appetizer several times during the summer by topping garlic-rubbed toasted bread with a mixture of homegrown grape tomatoes and fresh basil tossed in olive oil and seasoned with sea salt. I usually jazz it up with crumbled goat cheese and drizzled balsamic vinegar and enjoy it with my family out on our cobblestone patio. Ah, bliss!
Empty the wok of any juices and add 2 tablespoons of peanut oil.
I might get some artwork up here yet, but in the meantime here is my all-time favourite Christmas commercial made in 2005!
Tom Wroblewski, the president of Machinists Union District Lodge 751 in Seattle, praised the work of the Everett Machinists and congratulated them on the award.
In order to bring some bright colors to this rainy Friday in New England (in Vermont at least – where did last week’s weather go?), let’s take another jaunt to St. Thomas, USVI. Originally named Charlotte Amalia, a map misspelling changed the name to Charlotte Amalie upon U.S. acquisition. Charlotte Amalia was the first settlement on St. Thomas, established in 1672 by Danish settlers. In its early years, it was a haven for pirates. The Charlotte Amalia Historic District includes government, civic and residential buildings. Learn more about the USVI historic sites on the NPS travel site (the website is dated, but the information is good).
11. Breaking Windows
Since it looks so much like peanut butter, people are tempted to spread it on toast – but I’ve found that only so-so, on the cookie spread scale of deliciousness. I haven’t baked with it yet – but I’m guessing it would make a ridiculous frosting for a cupcake – or a brownie or blondie.
ONGOING:
Is there really such thing as Me Time when you have small children? I don't think so, at least not in the way that it once was.
“Mamm’s gotten crankier, keepin’ after him. Jah, there’s that,” Emma agreed with a sigh. “But Lord love ‘em, they’re gettin’ by as best they can. I’ll work on ‘em while you and Zanna’re out makin’ your family calls these comin’ weeks. They may as well get used to the fact that their last two kids have lives of their own.”
Consumers don’t eat soda and snack food because they are good for them–they eat them because they taste good and want a snack (and not always a healthy one!). In addition, consumers like the head-to-head competition between Coke and Pepsi; it forces them each to bring their best advertising, packaging, and new products to the table for consumers; it brings out the best in both of them.
Hmm....
against a strip of deep blue sky not
A government report published earlier this week tells how the Secret Service agents involved in the Colombian prostitution scandal paid nine of the 12 women that they took home from the bar on that wild evening.
For example, at work, I’m constantly on the lookout for potential changes in my industry or for my clients. That way when changes pop up, I’m not often caught off guard.
We parked in the garage (on the roof) and went to the Expo. Got my packet (painless) and shopped a bit. Apparently they do not make 26.2 string bags any longer (or ANY string bags). I had had one that said 13.1 from my first full there but left it at Yosemite in a bear locker. :-(
Surprises like coming home to a spotlessly clean house after a long day at work. Like a beautiful mirror purchased at the thrift store, repainted, and hung on the wall while the husband was out of town. Or what about going to drop off two friends in Yosemite for their 3-week John Muir Trail trek and deciding while there to join them for the entire journey? (For the record, that last one has never happened to me, but it did happen to someone I know well. Rumor has it that his wife was infinitely awesome when he called from Tuolumne to say he’d changed his plans and wouldn’t be home for a few more weeks. She told him to go for it and have fun. An unexpected response from a spouse can be another good surprise.)
The book continues with a chapter on 1920s/30s night-clubs, the 'bottle parties' of the jazz age where the likes of the redoubtable Mrs. Meyrick opened clubs in Soho basements, negotiating with both corrupt policemen and criminal gangs, always bouncing back after arrest and imprisonment. Then, finally, a chapter on the Windmill Theatre, famous for its 'nude tableau', run by the eccentric Mrs. Henderson.
"I am convinced that it if 'Jix' had a pint of beer he would ask for another. He is just us human as you or me, but a man with a Nonconformist conscience and a bee in his bonnet about beer cannot be expected to hold sane views about anything.
I run upstairs, turn on the shower, get to my room where the pillows are pulsing. The people-faces from the garden are stretched out, bleeding on the mattress. I can't stop anything. I can't keep my mind moving outside of the yellow and red cycle that's taking my head out. The alarm clock is even doing it, somehow making colors where there should only be sound.
On my part, I’m so so thankful that Allah had permitted me to spend a valuable though short time with him. I’m thankful I was able to assist looking after him while he was in the hospital and him being a guest in my home for 4 days upon his discharged from the hospital. So very very thankful *sob*
I've been a slacker in getting my Activity Day activities posted as of late...my apologies. So while I was putting this one together I thought I would make a better effort of getting a few pictures and getting it posted.
Thus, you can imagine in part my disappointment when I found myself without a partner to share the joy of opening lock number twenty-two as karma had finally kicked me in the butt and added all those late minutes I've blogged about and pasted them onto a series of subway mishaps making date number 22, who shall henceforth be known as "Don", approximately one hour late to our date and thirty minutes beyond the closing time of PostNet box number 136 in the Bronx.
The fox has also been commonly portrayed in lore as a shapeshifter, possibly due to their adaptability and mystique. Usually people shy- and rarely seen, this generally nocturnal creature walks the mystery filled world that lay between dusk and dawn. This lead some cultures to consider it wise in the ways of the “between realms”- those places & states between darkness and light, life and death, godhood and mortality.
Meacham: Obama is another Jimmy Carter!
Day 45: Blood Harvest (S. J. Bolton) (2010).
- Free, no need for wristband shows 24 hours a day all over town.
It hasn't been easy, adjusting to this new normal. But Annie has come so far in the last four months and we are so proud of her. She was so excited to receive her beads - and for someone who has pretty much open access to all kinds of beads here, that's saying a lot! That's because the Beads of Courage beads were hard-earned, and that's what makes each and every one so special. Thank you, thank you, Beads of Courage.
Flowers, I said, will come of it.
Many other social situations (other than work) have far too much pressure towards talking and asking about personal things and histories that are nobody's damn business, rather than simply acting like a good person. And for any creature who's inclined to be reserved, that increases isolation rather than diminishing it.
Self: “Where does that come from? Were you read to a lot as a child?”
a computer ..... well, the whole
At that time the vaRozvi were at Mutoko. Their chief Nyemba inozvimbira chita chese had called all the chiefs of Southern Rhodesia to come to Mutoko so that he could become acquainted with them. At that time the vaRozvi gave all the chieftainships in this country. Chinamaringa and Chidziva chose men to accompany Chihungwa to Mutoko. They told Chihungwa, “When you reach there, you must tell , chief of the vaRozvi that you are the chief of Chishawasha.” On the way he fell sick and died before reaching Mutoko. The people who were with him carried him back to Chishawasha and he was buried there.
We start rehearsals for Bye Bye Birdie Monday night.... yes, I have a one week overlap between shows! I'll run from my rehearsals to Birdie, hopefully with time to grab something to eat in between. Josh is convincing me to join the YMCA out here, so expect to see some exercise logs starting next month! I knew he was good for me :)
Original Movie Title : Il signor Max
Yazoo Brewing Company Sly Rye Porter
My Mom read to us often when we were little. It didn’t matter whether she read German books or English books – reading is reading. Books engaged my imagination by introducing me to places, people and things that I wouldn’t otherwise have encountered. In elementary school, my favourite subjects were reading and composition. When my homework assignment was the writing of a 3-page composition, I wrote 16 pages. Later I was blessed to be in a job where I wrote stories in newsletters, promotional materials, media releases/advisories, fundraising letters and so on. I love telling stories. Stories link us together. Our stories are woven with those of others and become part of a bigger story about our collective experiences; our suffering, our overcoming, our loves, our resentments, our forgiving, our grudges, our victories and losses, our giving and taking.
back to their penned plot at the Pond House.
Though the news of this ongoing global catastrophe is still being heavily censored in the US, the same cannot be said about Japan, and as recently reported by the leading Japanese newspaper The Mainichi Daily News that reports:
There is a very vague slightly darker grey smudge across the centre of the photo... that is the new fire hall that was just built. It is probably 300 yards from my place. And now, 20 minutes later, I can't see it at all!
SPEAKER: John Braheny is a top consultant/coach for songwriters, writer/artists and music industry entrepreneurs. His book, The Craft and Business of Songwriting has sold over 70,000 copies (Currently in 3rd Edition). John music career has encompassed many years as a solo acoustic performer, songwriter, followed by recording artist and commercial jingle writer/producer. He and Len Chandler founded and ran the legendary Los Angeles Songwriters Showcase (1971-1996). He's past president of California Copyright Conference (www.theCCC.org ), and served for eight years on the L.A. Chapter Board of Governors of N.A.R.A.S (www.Grammy.com ). He conducted, edited and produced more than 50 interviews with hit songwriters and producers for United Airlines Inflight Entertainment. He's a consultant and screener for TAXI.com, teacher and journalist. For a full bio on John and his critique/consulting services, go to www.johnbraheny.com
Now finally assembling the dessert. Dip the bread slices into the sugar syrup and assemble it on a wide plate. Sprinkle the fried fruits and nuts on the top. Now pour the milk mixture over these fried bread pieces. (I have garnished with some raw finely chopped pistachios and sliced almonds).
Debbie "James, what did you just do wrong?"
A redesign won’t work miracles. But one that improves the user interface, makes navigation more intuitive, and delivers your core message more clearly can only help you. The last thing you want to do is infuriate your target audience—a lesson the BBC learned all too well just recently. So make sure you put the task of redesigning your site in the hands of a team that understands both design and architecture.
Amit Bansal is the co-founder and CEO of PurpleLeap, an entry-level talent management company specializing in providing quality ‘ready-to-deploy’ talent to the industry. Amit started his career with Asian Paints, in Sales and Distribution, before joining IT industry with Riverrun, delivering customer solutions on cutting edge technologies. Later, Amit joined Talisma, where he gained expertise in developing and marketing technology products across India, US and Canada as Director, Product Management. In an exclusive interview with India Education Review Amit discusses measures to bridge the skill gap in India and role of private sector in this regard.
When we are unhappy with something to the point that we would like to do something, we light candles, fast, walk, talk and write. In our times, the state machinery can tear gas you and beat you up and arrest you for this. We take pride in our peaceful agitations, but as a matter of fact thats all we can do.. we can do nothing more. We are not even organised.
Many people have memories associated with music. A song you heard on your first date, music that your grandparents always played, a song that made you smile, or one that made you cry. Music Monday, is a time to share those memories.
Instead of being a stinging indictment on government and corporate policy, the filmmakers instead illustrate poignantly the conditions and existence of those people money-hungry companies and corporate funded governments have chosen to ignore.
Half Blind
As always, thank you for stopping by and looking, I appreciate your comments and critiques.
Foodies love to dismiss the whole gang of Food Network cooks as one large gang of untalented amateuers and that Sandra Lee is the equivalent of Paula Deen who is the equialent of Giada DeLaurenits. I'm not sure where this comparison comes from.
You became a human and a monster,
The family added one modern addition to the property in the 1970s—a paved road. I learned how to ride a bike on that road when I was 6, and when I was 9, an especially deep groove in the pavement’s weathered surface confronted my roller skate wheels. I have a scar on my right knee to remind me.
7. Strong desire to order that FREE District Identification Pass from thehungergamesmovie.com. (I decided against this because, Why on earth would I be working as a Ferrier living in District 1?? That’s ridiculous.)
If you've been to one of my fitness classes it's something you'll hear me say, 'put in the effort now and get the results!' Also as an instructor I get more out of my job when I put the extra effort in to give my participants a fun and hard workout.
However, Berliner did not respond to an e-mail sent on Monday asking why the foundation has no public presence and for details about the fundraising dinner.
Finally….Charles and Camilla arrived and due to people being in the way of my camera I got some very very bad quality photos indeed as the camera was focusing on the wrong person!! But still, have a look at the photos below!!
Asked what he meant by singing those words, Nhlapo replied: "I have the right not to comment. I prefer not to say what I meant'.
It's just you and Arson, and a room full of Death Eaters. What happens?
Head: 95th%
- Americans who purchase medicine with Health Savings Account or Flexible Savings Accounts will face new limitations.
(Oh, and we did our snowmen with the plates concave, but I think it might actually be cuter with the plates backwards so they have more of a real snowman look. It would just make it harder to stick it to the wall that way. But either way works.)
Later a faltering German defense in Europe ultimately allowed these convoys to survive and, more importantly, allowed the Russians to continue to save their country from within thanks to these much-needed supplies.
While I was taking the pictures of the grapes I turned around and look at him, keeping his eye on me, all the while Cleo(the black, chubby one is looking for sopmething to eat and Puppy is ever vigilant waiting to herd the neighbors car. She doesn't get too far cause the fence stops her.
per cent.
For vinaigrette:
this won’t even help with the blood letting
Nowadays, though, the ideal is changing. It seems that more and more publishers are dividing payments into thirds, or more. Partial payment on signing, partial on delivery and acceptance, sometimes partial on the delivery and acceptance of proposals for any other books, and the dreaded partial payment upon publication. I hate that. Authors hate it. Agents hate it and publishers love it. It’s becoming standard now at most houses, so complain all you want, you’re not getting out of it, no matter how small your advance is.
"No, really. Absolute zero is when all thermodynamic energy stops. Quantum motion within the atoms themselves never stops."
She commented that when she sees this, though it sounds harsh, her expectations drop. It's an immediate strike against the manuscript which takes amazing writing to overcome.
And how many agonies and distresses are there for a person who dies on his bed- and a standing (praying) or a sleeping person in Jihad is better than a fasting or standing (praying) person not in Jihad- and whosoever acted as a guard or escort in Allah’s Cause, his eyes will never witness the Fire (Hell) and that a day spent while one is in Jihad for Allah’s Cause is better than the world and whatsoever is in it.
that one! My first attempt looked like four
mid-2009.
The entrance into the canyon is very narrow. Photo bags need a shove to make it through the slot, and sucking in your stomach might be required for some! I was without a tripod and just had a small day bag. While my pictures might have been clearer if my camera was mounted on a tripod, I was glad I didn’t have too much equipment on me.
We'll be back in England when we can, but for now, to all our loved ones: we love you; to all our friends: we miss you; and to everyone else: hi.
This will be her professional debut performance and to be cast as Annie is a dream come true!
Who could blame her if it were true?
I also want to thank Down Sunshine Lane. I have ordered some charts from them and explained I was unable to work out the fabric for one of them: remnents of chemo brain. Bless them, they have done it all for me and I am looking forwards to seeing what they chose for me!
Prayer should not be an obligation. You should desire and thirst for prayer, for it sustains us through hard times and the unknown. Are you frustrated because you are not getting results after praying? We cannot be demanding, just ask and receive. Sometimes our view of receiving is not God’s view.
When I was a kid, I wanted the Intercontinental Belt. I wanted to wear it around my waist, go to school and exert dominance upon my international peers, claiming that I was better and America was number one because the champion of all continents was an American. To me that title meant something, more than just a heavy piece of metal with a fancy design on it. But the years have humbled me* and my patriotism has matured* and now I have an idea of what the belt would mean to me now. As irony would have it, it STILL represents that dominance in a way, but not in a smarmy “I’m better than you” but an inspiring “I’m better than you”.
I still hope that pretty comes back, although I think it not likely any time soon. For every Taylor Swift, there are a hundred Megan Foxs, or Lindsay Lohans, or Miley Cyruses etc.
My friend Jennifer (one of three, this one is the musician one) has posted some pictures of absolutely heinous Christmas ornaments.
of faith is one of the different kinds of prayer and it has it peculiar rules
P.S. The Microsoft Encarta Encyclopedia tells me that the Renaissance finished somewhere near 1590-1600, but I just wanted to stretch it a bit because this post was in fact more about the early modern era. So cut me some slack.
2 Panic
Mr. Warburton!
It is my shelter, it is my air
SO you wanna burn the Koran UMMMM!
Unfortunately, around 8am or so, another gal in labor arrived, ending Dan’s ability to stay with me in the labor room. Her water had broken in the night and so although she hadn’t had any contractions, they wanted to monitor her & knew her contractions would probably start soon. Turns out her contractions started pretty fast after she arrived!
I love you, Mama J............
crash cart as if
Hopefully, if you do all that, it will work for you. If it doesn’t, check to see if you’ve missed any steps. The only thing I ask is that you don’t try to mix up my instructions with something you found on some other site, then come asking for help if it doesn’t work. It probably won’t work if you do it that way.
*** PLEASE send love to at least the first two posts before you ***
Brush each breadstick with half of the melted butter and sprinkle half of the seasoning mixture on the breadsticks.
Since moving to Texas three years ago my Mom has only come down twice to visit us. We go up to Ohio 2 to 3 times a year. So, that means I really only see her a few times a year.
Restauration Gilt-Bronze Mounted Mahogany Library Table
Or is it, actually, a coincidence that Datin Noraini Hussin is married to the Minister for Infrastructure Development?
In more ways than one, as it turns out! I started to do this post and I couldn't type anything. First, I must explain something.... I am NOT a laptop person, although I use a laptop at home. When my monitor packed in my husband, in his infinite wisdom, decided that if he was going to spend £100 on a new monitor, he would be better off spending £350 on a laptop for me. I must admit, I liked the idea of one until I came to have to use it! Laptop keyboards are all wrong, too flat, and those stupid mice thingies do not like me. The laptop takes on a mind of it's own when I try and use the mouse thing. So...............my laptop is permanently anchored to the computer desk that my real computer was on, and attached to it is a real mouse (well, not really real - a computer one), and a proper keyboard that you can type on.
The race was hard. I thought the only difficult part would be Lover’s Leap, but I was wrong. Right before the race I heard someone say Highway 79 is harder than LL. I couldn’t believe that would be true, but it was. I ran the first 11 minutes straight and then checked my heart rate. It was too high for my liking so I began to walk. You have to listen to your body no matter what your mind wants to do.
Fabrication of the first aircraft is well underway with the company’s Belfast division having shipped wing spars and skins to Bombardier’s new manufacturing plant in Querétaro, Mexico, dedicated to the model. Final assembly, flight testing and customer delivery of the aircraft will take place at the company’s Wichita, Kan., facility, which has undergone a major expansion to accommodate the new model.
That’s the main storyline behind DEVOURED BY DARKNESS, book No. 7 in Alexandra Ivy’s Guardian of Eternity series. And with this book, she starts to develop another world and immerse us in the plot to bring back the evil Dark Lord, who will wreck havoc on the planet and demon world.
and in pains. Nevertheless she joined in the worship in spite of all her pain
Line & Dot - $99
6. Eat salads with vinegar. Forgo fatty dressings, cheese, and croutons.
07 Improv
Undoubtedly Capello failed to deal with off-field problems as well as an experienced manager should have, letting captaincy issues force him into an early exit.
I was licking sauce off my fingers the entire meal. That's how BBQ is supposed to be!
passage and the opportunity to walk all over my morality.
It's one of those days. The kids don't stop fighting. Or whining, screaming, hitting, trying in vain to unlock the closet they've been shoved into...all the fun stuff. Throw my pretty much futile attempts at potty-training Nora in there too and it's just a banner day.
Let’s talk about this idea for a moment. When we think of a stereotype, we generally think of a negative generalization about a person, place, or thing that is gleaned from superficial information (i.e. skin color, gender, age, choice of clothing, etc). This article reviewed some of the dangers of acting outside of your perceived stereotype. Let’s be clear on what this means – if people think I fulfill the “nerd” stereotype, then I act in ways outside of this schema, it causes them cognitive dissonance. Either it means, I am an exception to the rule, or that they made a mistake in judging me. Most people will not allow themselves to take the blame, so they place the fault on me. In most cases, this causes the person who is judging you to view you as less favorably as before. Why? Because you caused them extra mental stress for failing to fall neatly in line with their already present mental constructs. Now let’s take a look at what this could mean for gender stereotypes.
14.The Staircase (Mystery)
Rapes in Sweden, the imposition of sharia in many British districts, intifada in France, restrictions on ideas of identity in Germany. What is happening in Europe, Josep, that such significant examples of political surrender of the ruling class still do not cause a reaction of native Europeans in order to ensure their own survival?
Sensors will be set up on a 30-storey building in North Kensington and a 14-storey building in Chelsea, in the west of the city, as well as a third location which is yet be determined.
I often find myself thinking about what could of been, what should of been, and what will never be. I hate that. I hate regret... I try to live without it, but regret is like a cavity, and once you have it, it's there for keeps. I keep reminding myself that could of, would of and should of...are NOT, so why bother entertaining those thoughts. I guess some things in life are just enevitable.
This article is current news but could just as easily have been written in those fairytale believing times from my childhood stories. The Zimbabwean Pastor Togare Mapingure believes in mermaids, but not in a good way. He believes that they are a demonic force responsible for kidnapping, torture and murder.
After a night in Chicago with some of my blogs friends, including Chicago Moms Bloggers, Sarah, MJ, Miss Lori, Nancy, NJ Moms Contributor Vanessa and NYC Moms' Beth, I stepped onto Belmont to quite a racket. When I looked around for the cacophonous source, my eyes stuck on the CTA tracks. There up on the elevated tracks was a sight to behold--the Santa Train!
I was super excited to team up with Baby Harmony and review some of their Pure & Free products!! I was very impressed with all their products, as I cleaned some of the most dirtiest spots in my house, including Banana Covered Glass Doors, Spilt Cream-Soda Floors, Muddy Finger painted Walls, and my Favorite Sgetti' Stained Shirts. Each product is designed to clean a certain area and every area I put to a test, their products worked wonders! My house hasn't been this clean since it was built in 2009.
understood but we had Suzanne there to translate so it all worked out.
I'm looking forward to getting home. It feels good just to be able to call it home. Next big event to plan.....getting a more significant place to live in SC, going back to Phoenix, collecting all my stuff, and driving it back across the country. That good bit 'o fun should happen sometime this summer....
So here is the thing: on the high-speed anti-grav tube from Eiger City to Natural City on Procyon IV, I was confronted by a very curious person: me.
-He is getting two top teeth that are just under the gums and he has 2 teeth on the bottom
-Sheamus sent into the ringpost, his wrist gets caught, fuck!
This time it was the usual things that distract you from posting. Firstly: I've got limited wardrobe here. Especially the first weeks of vacation, 'cause I just brought stuff for two weeks home, while I was staying three. Means: OMFG, I've got nothing to wear! O_O
But no, this “disco fever” necklace, described as being made of vintage chain with vintage glass and plastic balls, can be yours for USD $1400. Matching Clover Fringe earrings go for $420. Maybe I just want my cheap looking jewellery to actually be cheap. Maybe that’s my problem. Would love to hear what you think of this designer.
phenomenon. They were avowed abolitionists who embraced and proclaimed temperance and other reform movements in the years before the Civil War. The popularity of the group and their music spread their message across the deepening political divisions in the United States. Over a span of four decades, various combinations of family members (including, eventually, children and grandchildren) performed at protests and in prisons as well as on stages across the US and Great Britain.
God by giving his glory to Jesus and showing His glory to Jesus when Jesus was on earth, makes it clear for us that he is the one who totally deserves full glory of God. By the Word became flesh, God’s Plan having become human reality, we have seen his glory. Christ’s time had and has come. The glory of Christ Jesus shall also still be coming. He will come in glory. He saves the best for last. Let us therefore look out for this majestic glory, hopefully to come soon.
How one day the decision to love a little girl gave way to the pell- mell, rumble-tumble feeling of actually falling in love with her--so thankful.
* You must be able to comment on your allocated number of entries (we have a commenting rota in place).
I took my last hiatus because I had a child. I have now returned to working as a veterinary technician at a new clinic. It is in a small town so it is no real surprise that I have already run into many of the clients outside of the clinic. Most of the euthanasias are with the owner present. Today it was my child's pediatrician's dog. She was there with her husband and her children and they spent a significant amount of time explaining everything to the kids. They were thoughtful and gentle and her eldest son held the dog's head as the solution was injected. Before it was all in he said "she's gone, mama." Everyone in the room was tearful, including me. I excused myself silently and wondered to myself if she would mention today at our baby's next appointment which is in two weeks. Their family was beautiful.
It’s always a significant event when a new room for jazz opens. Whether it’s small or large, daily or weekly, it’s still something to acknowledge, at a time when existing music venues are struggling to survive and new arrivals are in short supply.
Gregorian time did not totally demolish earlier lunar times. They were seen in Rome, and in Roman catholicism generally as ‘pagan’ (from Latin, paganus, a countryman) and therefore ‘ignorant’ of Christian belief.
With the imminent arrival of my second daughter, my ship, the USS Rhode Island and also the USS Enterprise, where my mother in law Bev Crusher is are both travelling to my home planet of Wondawowman.
“Jesus Christ, Claypool,” Emerson retorted. “the captain could just as easily be the one. Grow some balls and stop making this harder than it already is.”
They can search for me all they want, but they will not find me.
I did not expect her to join a million Andhra girls in breaking their heart over Allu Arjun.
I will close this entry with this last statement from Marianne Williamson:
The colour is Martha Stewart's Sharkey grey (I picked up a sample container for $1). I really like the way it contrasts with the white legs - very subtle, but just interesting enough. Since it's not furniture paint, I'm going to ask Adam to add a couple coats of poly so I don't have to worry about marking up the surface (again - I already have a couple of spots to touch up). Then comes the fun part, adding accessories!
the icebox
This card says it all today. I finally have my computer back up and running. I'm feeling so much better than I have been the last few days. I have a newly designed blog and I'm entering a DT call. Yikes....so much in one day. I thought I needed a fresh look for my blog. I had the old template for some time now and I wanted something a little more simple. Does that make sense to any of you? LOL
"We're sorry," he started, "But the project's running over budget and we really can't afford you any more," his look sincere until he shakes her hand and moves in with an unexpected peck on the cheek. She reviles as the bile rises in her throat. "Fucktard" she thinks, this is all because I have an opinion, wouldn't suck your dick at the company Christmas party and made a mistake on a frigging spreadsheet but she smiles and departs graciously. She's a contractor, not paid salary, so open to use and abuse. They can let you go any time without warning, with out excuse.
Think about it. When is the last time you sincerely told one of your friends all of the thing you appreciate about him or her? They are the easiest people to thank based on access, but potentially the most taken for granted.
The patent for superconductors was filed on the 8th of April. Will she use these, if science is her career choice? If she wants to invent the star drive, she might have to.
But I digress. For me one of the most difficult questions arising from the post-humanism that arises from flat ontology is the question of how it requires us to rethink the nature of the ethical and political. When we reject the centrality of the human within being, treating the human and social as two system-references among others rather than the ground of all others, what consequences follow for how we think the ethical and political? There are a couple of options we can follow here. One would be to recognize that ethical claims are inherently object or system-specific. Here we get the sort of humanism that Scu worries about as following from flat ontology. The idea here would be something like the thesis that we have recognized the contingency of the human way of relating to the world (i.e., that other objects are organized in very different ways and therefore relate to the world in very different ways), but we are, at the end of the day, human and must therefore treat all other entities according to our own organization.
I hope you enjoy this special season with the people you love.
The taste was pleasant at racking but no lemony tones yet.
JOY. Nothing like feeling too tall for cycling. I can’t even go to the bathroom at the bar without being called a “Tall class of water.” No worries, I responded to the woman and said, “That’s nice, sorry I’m not a short shot of whiskey (like you)”
As she always did, Liesl closed her eyes to summon the music, to place herself in the hands of the composer. Sometimes she would hope for the faintest breath of God. This was one of those times.
Sigh. It does no good to "what if" a situation, I know.
He was polite enough just to nod.
Do you prefer the "Then" version?
This is the way that a legate ought to deal with the estates of the empire at the diet. He should hold God’s commandment before them and make of it an unavoidable necessity, and say: “Dear lords, emperor, and princes, if you would be emperor and princes, act as emperor and princes, or the Turk will teach you with God’s wrath and disfavor. Germany, or the empire, is given you and committed to you by God, that you may protect, rule, counsel, and help it, and you not only should, but must do this on pain of losing your soul’s salvation and God’s favor and grace. But now it is evident that none of you takes this seriously, or believes it, but you take your office as a jest, as though it were a mummery of the carnival, for you leave the subjects, whom God has committed to you, to be so wretchedly harassed, taken captive, put to shame, plundered, slain, and sold by the Turk. Do you not think, since Go has committed this office to you, and has given you money and people besides for you to do good to them, that He will demand at your hands all the subjects whom you so shamefully deserted, while you danced, reveled, showed off, and gambled? If you seriously believed that you were appointed and ordained of God to be emperor and princes, you would leave your banqueting and rivalry for high places and other unprofitable display for awhile, and consult faithfully how you might discharge your office and fulfill God’s commandment and rescue your consciences from all the blood and the misery which the Turk inflicts upon them. For how can God, or any godly heart think otherwise of you than that you hate your subjects or have a secret covenant with the Turk or, at least, hold yourselves for neither emperor nor princes, but for dolls and puppets for children to play with? Otherwise, it would be impossible that your consciences should let you rest, if you seriously held yourselves for overlords appointed by God, and were not to speak and advise together about these matters differently than you have done heretofore. In this you see that you are constantly becoming Turks to your own subjects. “Nay, you even take up the case of Luther and discuss, in the devil’s name, whether one can eat meat in the fast-times and nuns can take husbands, and things of that kind, which are not committed to you for discussion and about which God has given you no commandment; and meanwhile the serious and strict commandment of God hangs in the smoke, the commandment by which He has appointed you protectors of poor Germany; and you become murderers, betrayers, and blood-dogs to your own good, faithful, obedient subjects, and leave them to the Turk, nay, cast them into his jaws, as a reward for the bodies and money wealth and honor that they stake on you and reach out to you.”
We started choir and she started singing with us. Within a few minutes, she was her happy self again. As we shared a smile, I asked, “Feeling better?”
“Ham sandwich or peanut butter?”
The other night, Frank was watching that new zombie series on AMC, "The Walking Dead." At one point, a ~10yo boy spots his zombified mother outside the house. He bursts into tears, and his father tries to quiet him because, hey, if the zombies hear them, things are going to get ugly. What was interesting was that the scriptwriters chose to have the father respond compassionately. He snuggled his son close, spoke in loving tones, and offered the boy a pillow so he could cry into that.
I give up – I’m going back to the kitchen sink to do my dishes now. But I’ll be looking at the hose sprayer first!
Current “American Idol” judge Randy Jackson actually played bass and recorded with the group from 1985-1987.
Another way the exhibit empowers visitors is through FITE’s (Financial Independence Through Entrepreneurship) on-site micro-lending program. Thanks to a generous donation by Dermalogica, DNA Foundation, and KIVA, every visitor receives a micro-loan coded card. Visitors then step up to an on-site kiosk where they can activate the pre-assigned sum on the card for a woman who is turning her own oppression into opportunities (visitors can choose the region of the world as well as the industry they personally wish to support; that information translates into a loan recipient). Each micro-loan designated at the kiosks helps to allow a woman to go out and purchase materials or seeds for her farming operations, or for another to buy yarns for her hand-crafted materials on sale in her small shop. In turn, proceeds from these small, mostly artisan-based businesses empower women financially, allowing them constructively contribute to their small communities.
Churches like to have special Sundays. For example, many churches have an annual Youth Sunday when the church teenagers actually run the church service, from song leading, to announcements, to sermon, while the pastor sits and watches.
What do you write your songs about?
F. R. Vessent
Now, go and snap a friend out of their bad mood! Someone, somewhere is about to hop in bed with a gallon of Ice cream and a quick call/text/visit from you could brighten up their mood!
A year ago today we had no idea how much our lives were about to change for the better.
Aware of the suffering brought about when we impose our views on others, we are committed not to force others, even our children, by any means whatsoever – such as authority, threat, money, propaganda, or indoctrination – to adopt our views. We will respect the right of others to be different and to choose what to believe and how to decide. We will, however, help others renounce fanaticism and narrowness through practicing deeply and engaging in compassionate dialogue.
Check out these hypothetical questions: Is it permissible to pay taxes to Caesar or not? (Matthew 22:17) Is divorce OK or not? (Matthew 19:3) Do you have authority or not? (Matthew 21:23) Which is the greatest commandment? (Matthew 22:35) By whom do you cast out devils? (Luke 11:16) Are you for or against this adulterous woman? (John 8:6) Who sinned, this man or his parents? (John 9:2) Is the kingdom here or is it there, now or then? (Luke 17:20). These are the ones I noticed. Jesus’ answer in every case, refuses to let hypothetical questions impale him on the horns of theoretical dilemmas. In many cases, Jesus moves it to a specific example (which in the seminary we disparagingly called “situation ethics”, and where everything was also discussed theoretically!).
So last weekend, I finally get myself out of bed early and when in search. When the lady brings it out to pack, I knew, straightaway, I got it wrong. The plant is correct but the method of making is not the same. For my granny's dessert is greenish in colour and paste like, just like sesame seed paste. Whereas this lady's version is noodle like with ginger and sugar broth. I tasted nothing from what I can remembered.
My husband John celebrated another year older today. He saw a day that went from light snow in the morning to sunshine, to rain, to sunshine to light snow. Yes this is another spring day on the mountain. This will be our 5th spring in Zigzag and the earliest we have seen daffodils and primroses in the yard in full bloom. John ended his B-day with his favorite birthday dessert dumplings, this year he wanted peach. Enjoy the following recipe and think of the summer days to come and picking fresh peaches.
With the line-up beginning to look a bit one-sided I set to, and here's what went with what.
It is mandatory that you script the same verse, sing the same song and dance to the same tune. You cannot afford any disagreement and conflicting statements to hit the sail. If you are not vigilant and are unable to harness the changing winds that is proving to be increasing in your favour, you risk losing all of it with any signs or even a whisper of your in-congruent positions.
I was watching one of Bill’s shows – aren’t his daughters the cutest things ever? – and he made these bars. On the following morning, I found the exact amounts of almonds and jam in my fridge; I considered it a sign – you know how much I’m fond of signs – and started baking the bars right away. :D
Anything making you queasy or sick: Nothing comes to mind...
In the meantime, Crown Prince decides to talk a walk and who does he see in the hospital? None other than his beloved crown princess. He rushes towards the glass, smashes into it and hits the ground. Ouch * 2.
In answer to this, we need only consider a profound, if simple, idea that Tolkien articulated: we do not control power, power controls us.
I saw a Martha Stewart show where she had a guest who made candied lemon peel. I love lemons and I'd never really considered candied lemon peel. My peels tend to freshen my disposal :-) Martha couldn't stop nibbling on these so I decided I was going to take a stab at making them. LOVE lemons. Love these...OMG is an understatement!
*writing more teen subjects
A recent conflict took place in southern Italy, started by local kids shooting some Africans (most foreign workers are illegal, it appears) with air rifles.
Then drizzle a little more olive oil over chook and some salt.
The stars beautifully guide me to you
that she was disabled and could not
Whew, never meant to be gone that long. I actually have a bunch of blog posts in my head to do-just need to do it! Did you miss me? :-)
In short all the above investigations denounce mankind had advanced in the civilization of Atlantis and Rama. Even long before man ever entered the century 4000SM space and nuclear technology. But the golden age was ended by a devastating nuclear war until the aftermath, people had time to go back to primitive times to the advent of Sumerian civilization around 4000SM or 6000tahun ago.
Former army interrogator Jay Ryan is enjoying the quiet life after leaving the military far behind - or so he thinks. Because old habits die hard and he's quickly thrust back into the thick of things when a disgruntled scientist, backed by the Australian security industry, develops a weapon of mass destruction - a hybrid strain of Anthrax - to be used to create panic in a population apathetic to crime prevention.
In 1965, a full-fledged war broke out between India and Pakistan. The masses were given an impression that India was the aggressor. The Radio Pakistan churned out fantastic and spirit lifting war-time anthems. People stood behind the armed forces. Defeat was not an option for the Muslim forces of the Islamic Republic of Pakistan attacked by infidels.
Westwood Works Way Up Leaderboard At Masters 2012: Lee Westwood has an advantage in the first round at a major for the first time in his career.Not really the distinction he is trying, though.Westwood reeled off four straight birdies on the front on Thursday en route to a stress-free round of 5 – under-par 67 at the Masters, where he is still trying to win his first major championship.
FabScraps Heritage Collection (2 6x6 sheets each)
“Whatever the present moment contains, accept it as if you had chosen it.”
Science and Technology Facilities Council(STFC)
Firstly, keep this in mind:
Pinellas County Sheriff Bob Gualtieri fired four law enforcement officers after they were found to have shirked their duties while on the clock. One said he watched a movie while on duty. Two others were suspended.
I have never heard the UAF describe me as a Socialist.
The women in the sari, a golden sari looks at me, does she sense my negative energy, or is she a Goddess who is offering a ‘feminine’ support?
It is said that from the handbag a woman carries people can know many details about her. So does a watch for a man. Different people hold different opinions towards this saying. Some people agree with it while some disagree. I am in favor of it owing to the following reasons.
The farmer was tied up in an outside toilet while his wife was raped by all three attackers.
present moment.
Arben Dzaferi: The Balkans and the people on the Balkans have a problem with their political positions. Democracy is being developed and it contributes to the establishment of peace, but under one precondition: Without the existence of an established education system of values, you cannot make democracy like in the rest of Europe. In Europe all projects – political, religious, cultural, social, and economic are established on the strong foundations of education. People, who do not have such cultural tradition, come up with fake revolutionalism, based on prejudices.
You could make me cry if you don’t know
Anystalker, T Shiz was over there on his page talkin about how people got all kinda offended over a video aka Vlog (I like aka's makes me feel all CIA like) that basically poked a bit 'o fun at a parade in his hometown, hence poking fun AT his lil hometown. Now not unlike T Shiz, I too, come from a relatively small town in Pennsylvania. Now, nobody, and I mean, NOBODY outside of said small town has ever heard of where I come from despite the fact that it is only like an hour an a half drive from Philly. Yeaaa, everyone knows where PHILLY is but fuck Wilkes-Barre right!??! Whatever *stank eye*
Finallly the show ended and we plowed forward when people started leaving. We ended up in the second row next to a group of college guys who were tripping and high, completely sweaty and kind of annoying. By then we were packed in so tight it was hard to move around and pretty much impossible to dance. We were drenched in sweat because it was warm and muggy, no breeze at all so close to the stage. Luckily we had water with us. Some of the people around us were begging water from security whenever they walked past.
- Pupa n.724 from the Jeans n' Roses collection
... so here are the first few pages ...
Call me: 303-693-2306
After much searching, Michael was unable to find an easy-to-read book that explained how to study the Bible as covenant. Realizing that he was expecting someone else to do the work that he was capable of doing himself, Michael sat down to write the book he was searching for. Keeping Covenant with God: Living by the Blood of Jesus is the result.
Guard: I think you'll find most educated people regard mythical convictions as fundamentally animistic.
Yes. And next year, I will plan ahead. I will schedule my post if I see busy days ahead. I need to be more organized.
ruthlessly track
Then after some time, you came closer to me. With you, I was always myself because you accepted me that way. I liked the way you made fun of me when I was angry. The way you consoled me whenever I was sad over a petty little thing. The way you held me when I was shattering down into pieces. I never realized it before but now I know that I had fallen in love with you during those silly fights, Arham. I waited for your calls even though there was nothing to talk about. One text from you was enough to make me smile. It was Love all along, but I never understood that.
1 lb ground beef or venison
~Chicken fettuccine mixed with broccoli
I didn't have any bells for the center so I used some very sparkly beads. I might use more, and I'm still experimenting with the leaf shapes but I like how they turned out.
4. The people who stay on earth will explode 09:17
So, when Ambie’s followers gained momentum, King Ajit just allowed his men to execute the plan, while he kept silent and watched from afar with his big fat Mama. She was the wicked queen who had instigated her son to take over the throne from her brother-in-law, the late King Rah Man, who was loved by all citizens in the kingdom.
With this in mind, the British National Party will take a stand in defense of our heroes by having our two MEPs and our London Assembly Member use their own bodies to physically block the street and any attempt by Muslim fanatics to insult the memory of our fallen soldiers.
Last week, she had told her children that it was her time.
turned some of my Greeting Farm stamps into vampy vampires
This show… Is remarkable. To be honest, I was just thinking that this show would be just another advertising series for the J-pop group – AKB48….Seems like I was so damn wrong about it and that made me take a step back with my assumptions. If you are having the same impression as me about it being just a nuisance series, do watch it, it is truly wonderful.
The small size Sprout® watch is 80% Eco-friendly (by weight)
It was to be a Christian book. I was a Christian then.
What I found seemed to echo itself with every personal account of every poor mother that I came across. We are made to feel ashamed of ourselves. Because of that, we often hide the fact that we are on welfare from other people. Social workers have numerously made all of us cry tears of frustration at one point or another.
Use Fun Flock or Flower Soft on the chicks and bunnies tails. Try tiny pom poms on the bunnies.
First of all, most places that you query will have a response time listed somewhere. Whatever that response time is, I find it’s best to just forget about it for as long as you can. Why? Because you don’t want to go crazy with anticipation, that’s why! Of course, you probably won’t be able to forget because you studied the market and chose to send your precious manuscript to this particular agent/editor/publisher for a reason, right? So, take that response time and add a few months to it. The horror! But people in publishing are busy! They have stacks and stacks and stacks of words to read. A person can only do so much so fast. What I like to do is wait until I can barely stand it. (Funny how this usually coincides with the listed response time) and then wait at least another two months before I status query. Yes, I said two months. Maybe even three. Why? To give the person the time to read my manuscript without the added knowledge that I have been bugging them to do so.
The dog fox cubs will be the first to leave the nest and find their own way. The young vixens will stay with their mother for a while longer.
“It turned and ran 100 miles an hour across that field,” Robinson said. “It was as shocked and surprised to see me, as I was to see it. I took a shot at it, but it was too far off by then. I turned it around for a second when I hit him in the haunch with a few pellets from my turkey load, just to say goodbye.”
Rose was a force, let me tell you. How she managed to raise her two daughters, and take on whatever kid wanted to spend the night, plan all these events, and still have the energy to lead our troop of hoodlums... I'll never understand it. We weren't her only charges either - she had her church-home that she gave JUST as much energy to.
Same logic applies.
Part of the immeasurable fun of going on a mini-adventure is the planning. Be it a dirty weekend in the Lakes or Peak or sorting logistics for fortnight on the trail or road, the sense of anticipation is keenly felt.
As we lift Jesus up in our lives and accept Him as our Savior, the sweet savor of His sacrifice is lifted up to God. In this God is pleased as he writes our names into the Lamb’s Book of Life, showing us that He is pleased with the sweet aroma of grace. We are the fragrance of Christ. In Him we have our gifts, grace, and comfort. He is the good news which we proclaim to the world. The sweet aroma and fragrance of the sweet presence of Christ in our hearts is made possible by His blood, righteousness, sacrifice, and grace. It is as we find ourselves basking in His glory; forgiven by His blood; that our lives reflect the gift of God in Christ Jesus and we become a sweet fragrance to God. In this we are grateful and well pleasing to the Lord, as we show forth His glory and honor, proclaiming salvation to the world, comfort to hurting and lost and victory to the enemy.
Later that evening, a few teammates woke me up and reminded me that I still hadn't celebrated my very recent 21st birthday. This being the case, I was expected drink (read: buy alcohol for everyone else). Being impulsive, I reluctantly grabbed my wallet and walked with my friends to a gas station (which carried juice and was only about three blocks from the hotel in the opposite direction). I tried to buy a six pack of beer but my newly legal I.D. was turned down because it was out of state and I "looked like a goddamn 16-year old." The cashier ended up selling the beer to my friend who was only 20 and had a fake I.D.
I spent the week debating how to decorate the case. Dragons were one option, baby eating cannibals (from the chancel arch of a local norman church) were another. John suggested a Yorkshire rose, since we live in the old north riding - but the trouble is I’m not really a Yorkshire lass, for all my current abode, so I decided to go heraldic and do a simple laid and couched version of the arms of the city of Durham – the town where I was born, and in whose county I grew up. This was the first time I’ve done embroidered slips in donkey’s years, hence they may no be entirely straight – velvets hard as it moves under your needle. Laid and couched work heraldry was just nicely undemanding for a Sunday afternoon fun project though.
And if my boat be storm-tossed and beating for the bay,
Imidazolidinyl Urea – See Urea.
- Western state governors could not provide proper security for the Japanese, or from saboteurs among them.
"They ordered us out of the car and told us to lie on the floor and remove our wallets and watches," victim Michael Harriott told a local newspaper.
While the sausage is cooking, chop the kale mixture very finely. You will use most of it in the pasta, but we served the leftover vegetables on the side--they taste like a steakhouse creamed spinach dish, but way healthier.
Talking vs. Listening:
This weekend, I sewed my little tush off, baked some incredible cupcakes (if you like chocolate), made 50 cake pops, attended 2 birthday celebrations, traveled, and took engagement pictures for our best friends. As soon as I recover, I promise I will return you to your regularly scheduled craft programing. :)
Flash – upgradeable by Micro SD memory card (max 16GB) WiFi : 802.11 b/g/n
Large dog breeds, and most often males, are most likely to become infected. No reason for this disparity has been determined, although it may be simply due to the likelihood of those dogs roaming more.
___ any suggestion that the author is a little too close to the book for me to risk providing an objective review? In the email referred to above, the novel was about a seven-year-old who was raped. I'm very hesitant to comment on anything which seems like self-therapy for the author. Plus, I’ve already had the experience of pointing out something that seems unrealistic, only to have the author claiming it was possible because it happened to her.
You'll be glad to know that Fred doesn't totally succeed in his mission to make Martha good. Will we see more of this character? I do hope so.
It was on Cystic-L that I eventually became very close friends with a woman named Alicia Lynch. It was uncanny how a woman that I had never met could have so much in common with me and how we agreed that it felt like we had known each other our entire lives. Over time, Ali and I became very close and I considered her to be my sister.
Starting a weight loss plan is usually the easy part for me. Sticking to it for an extended period of time is the tricky part. For now, my efforts are still going strong. I am proud to say that, starting on May 30, I have been going to the gym at least 5 days per week. One aspect of this that has helped me to go regularly and maintain a level of excitement about getting my workout in has been that I go with my husband. Having a gym partner is also motivating because if I don't go, I'm not only letting myself down but someone else as well.
There is a man who lives in our neighbourhood, and Mama and I used to see him when we would go to weekly Trivia at a local pub. He was walking down the street, and when we walked past him, I couldn’t help but notice that he bears a striking resemblance to former Montreal Canadiens goaltender Patrick Roy. Now, I wasn’t convinced that it was him, but he did look similar. Any questions I may have had were put to rest a few minutes later when we arrived at the bank, and he walked in behind us. He said something about the weather, and since he clearly didn’t have a french accent, it wasn’t him. Also, we learned his name later that night, when he also happened to be at Trivia(it’s a very small town, and there’s not a lot to do on a weeknight). So even though we know his name, we still refer to him as “Pat Roy”, which we pronounce the same way that Don Cherry would. For those of you who aren’t a)Canadian, or b)hockey fans, it would take way to long to educate you about the entity that is Don Cherry.
I love reading between the lines when these two write to each other. Look at that... he writes so clearly until we get to the sling or is it fling? I fear Y's intentions are not too honorable, but then can we blame him. X is a bit of a tease and made him so jealous when she went to Cuba.
is there a big blockage of goldfish in my colon?
They are interesting, every one, and valid. They represented a journey for me, my journey…. I can, with this hand and this brain, translate what I see in such a way that other people can see it too. I can make birds live on paper. And these old bird bones… were part of that process, part of the looking and looking, until you really understand how something works and can then reproduce it in a way, now, that I don’t even have to think about.”
By the time Clarke reached her 30s, she still got work, but bit parts and no film credits. Toward the end of her career she had a small part in the TV show “F Troop.” I guess that qualifies as bottoming out.
It was like a give and take show where you receive some comments and get readers if you comment on their blogs.
#1: You can run behind someone for 13.1 miles (2 hours, 42 minutes) and still think their butt looks cute at the end of the run.
Pulling out of the station
TOP made a comeback with a shocking mint green hairstyle. What’s your thought for the ‘ALIVE’ album?
Thank you for attending the service today. I want you to know this made me very happy. Only you and I know the extent of your devotion to me. This letter is not to condemn you in any area you might lack completeness, but to tell you that I love you. I loved you when I gave my life for you. It would be many, many years until you would be born, but I knew you just the same, and I knew you well. I knew, many years ago, about all the things you would like and dislike - all about your temper and your weaknesses - all about the times you would fail, but that made no difference to me. I love you so much I died for you. And, child, I love you just as much today.
I decided Sherlock Holmes would be a great test subject for my foray into using an electronic reading device because, out of all the (public domain) classics, it seemed one of the least sacrilegious to read on a screen. Holmes was pretty up the to the minute, technology wise—he wouldn’t be offended by being read in digital form, would he? (Yes, I worry about these things) Also, they are short stories, so I would only need to survive the kindle for short periods of time.
‘The modern era is often described as a skills economy,’ writes Richard Sennett* (p. 37), ‘but what exactly is a skill?’ It is assumed that the more skilled one is, the more advanced in one’s career one ought to be, with more responsibilities and more strategic influence. But skills, Sennett argues, are more about problem solving through repetition. One acquires them through a learning process of repeating a task until something ‘clicks’ and then repeating it some more until one finds better ways of doing it. ‘Skill opens up in this way only because the rhythm of solving and opening up occurs again and again’ (p. 38).
I don't know about you, but I still have trouble wrapping my mind around the Creator of the universe noticing puny me, let alone loving me the way He does!
Debt crisis
The plot was well paced and interesting. The novel does end on a bit of a cliff-hanger but leads in well to the next in the series. I’m definitely going to be continuing reading these books.
Iridologists maintain that the eyes reveal information about the person’s physical and emotional constitution, such as inherited weaknesses and risks to which the person may be prone. Strengths may also be revealed, including inherited emotional tendencies from which the person derives particular talents.
We are, like all things, just fleeting forms already on our way to somewhere else. Poised between black despair and exquisite beauty, ours is a geologic perspective, a vision of the human cast against the elemental sweep of the universe. As in Tu Fu's most famous line: "the nation falls into ruins: rivers and mountains continue." We all share the exile in a wilderness cosmology of relentless transformation.
I don't understand why the art world is so reluctant to find value in play, joy and humor. I feel any way I can bring more laughter into this life, it is a good thing? What do you think?
The job of a chemical engineer also demands responsibilities. While performing their task, the engineers must be well versed with the chemical processes involved in the manufacturing of products. They should know how these processes can have an effect on the environment. Chemical engineers need to do their work without making an harm to the environment, consumers and the workers. Every stage of the entire manufacturing process is thoroughly revised by the engineers to ensure the safety of workers as well. Long work-related experience is valued highly in the field of chemical engineering.
“How can you sit like that?
The initial six-month pilot program, which began April 28, 2008, has shown that the patent process benefits when interaction between the applicant and the examiner are enhanced at the beginning of examination because patentability issues can be resolved early when the applicant and the examiner discuss them one-on-one. For the applications involved in the initial pilot, the First-Action Allowance rate increased six-fold when compared to applications from the same technology area not involved in the pilot.
Ladies and Gentlemen I bring you
This station is one of the most interesting because there is absolutely no advertising, which on any other stop is very common. It's a refreshing stop full of primary color visuals instead of ads (says me who does advertising for a living). It's also the "bright" reminder that I've crossed the Seine and am only about six stops away from French class.
A few weeks ago I did a big post on concealers here. Since then I have bought and used the Collection 2000 Lasting Perfection Concealer that I have so often had recommended.
I blinked. “Max as in my brother Max?” I was quite confused.
My co-workers really like Jello too. One person walked into the break room, and shouted "Jello!!" This is a festive, no-bake, super easy recipe that spreads lots of Christmas joy! Recipe here.
Friday - Italian Chicken and steamed veggies
Friday night is normally steak night at our house, has been for some time now as a way to reward us for our grueling week at work. The steak varies; on a good week I'll grill some rib-eyes which is our favorite. Other times it might be the best sale of the week like a T-bone or NY strip, and sometimes I'll coax and pamper a sirloin or a chuck mock steak and treat it like mignon (or think about one anyway), whatever the budget allows. Heck, I've even grilled hamburger steaks and ladled on fancy sauces. I don't let much get in the way of steak night.
The book will include 15 stars and snowflakes; using mostly basic techniques, and some of them beads.
PS - when I told my husband about this and added that "I knew this would happen one day," his response was, "I told you so." How does that work as a useful response? Anyway, at least I know where the kitchen sieve lives. I have the right sort of brain.
Brr-ownies were on my short list and she really wanted brownies as well. I ask you, what could be better than the cool taste of peppermint in the middle of summer? Nothing! :) These were simple to make: one bowl, one cutting board, a knife, a spatula and a whisk. I didn't have to pull out the big equipment which is good since I destroyed my food processor. If you get a chance to make these please do (except for you Ang, I don't think you will like them). They are delicious.
There is excellent news to report, for those who like to read stories that I’ve written.
Dissect/analyse a favorite or hated toy.
Books that would have made the decision easier had they been available to me are:
He then explains how Marxist leaders use informers to make lists of anti-Communist and other politically incorrect people who they want to execute once they – actually a Jewish oligarchy – come to power. The oligarch’s secret lists include “civil rights” activists and idealistically-minded “useful idiot” leftists as well.
Here’s a good example of what happens when we believe that God has ordained a particular social order:
There is more detailed information on abortion and vaccines on her site, with GRAPHIC pictures (so don’t look at the picture if you get upset. I didn’t).
We can be better, the efforts of many people in this film profoundly illustrates that.
This week's card features SST's Mouse Treat digi stamp. I Copic colored the mouse and paper pieced him to a die cut tag I splattered with mists and covered the edges with Tim Holtz Tissue Tape. I cut out the lollipop separately and coated blue baker's twine with Glossy Accents and coiled it around the lollipop. I liked that when it dried it looked glossy like a giant hard candy lollipop would look. Then I took two different colors of scrap chevron patterned paper and cut strips and adhered them down. Tied a bow at the top with linen thread and added a tiny flag with a sentiment stamped on it. I stamped "Happy Birthday" inside, I think it would be a cute card for a little boy's birthday.
Mother: Why not?
Amani over at “americanmuslimconvert” are writing on the five pillars of Islam, introducing us for the first of them, the Shahâdah, the confirmation of believe in Allah and His messenger, Muhammad, being expressed in the statement “Lâ ilâha ilâllâh, w’Muhammadan Rasûlullah” – “There is no god but Allah, and Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah!”
And gun—I’m guessing each a phoney one.
What are the chances??? Probably slim to none - - - but it made me pause to think anyway.
This is my little corner of creativity. Can you tell I’m either outgrowing the space…OR…heaven forbid I am just not that good at keeping it organized?! In the moment of inspiration, I’m just not that focused on where things should be placed neatly.
Djelibeybi is as busy as I remember it. I can’t visit my uncle or even risk being seen. I hide away as much as I can and stay away from the main marketplace. I explore the safer parts of the city and stay away from trouble. I have rented a tiny room in an inn not far from the marketplace, but before I did that I bought a veil and put on my black robes. I bought a widow’s veil. I should have been in Eritor now, a blushing bride. Instead, I am far from home, in a widow’s clothes.
Most. Terrifying. Dinner. Ever.
as a weapon being thrown around for a while
People who being to lose weight with diet and exercise tend to lose that weight more gradually, partly because their body composition is changing. They’re losing fat, but they’re also creating a pound or two of lean muscle tissue and increasing the density of their bones (WOO HOO, no osteoporosis!).
Well, since this is all very new to her. I wanted to be sure to assess what they knew and didn’t, to give Lexi an idea of what to focus on most in the next few weeks. I want to build up their weak areas and help them learn new things – which will help her keep their interest.
"If war is to have any meaning at all, its purpose must be to establish control over peoples and territories, and ultimately, this can be done only as Alexander the Great did it, on the ground. But because after the Civil War America's Allies again and again took the terrible losses required to bleed the enemy, Americans gradually developed a belief in cheap victory."
OK - My projects in no particular order!! I think I may just have more than 6 I can't narrow it down rofl!
“The Long Road to the Merry Cemetery” came to live from an idea born in Ireland.
The following, in light of the above, is also valid for many of the POD publishers I have researched.
Speaking to queries from the media, NUS Provost Professor Tan Eng Chye said he has met with Sun Xu and ‘counselled’ him. He admitted that Sun had acted in a manner in breach of NUS’s code of student conduct and that a board of discipline will be convened to look into the matter without giving a specific timeline.
I am not sure about other municipalities, especially outside of North America, but Vancouver does have its contingent of vocal dog owners who make sure there are dog leash-free park areas –a great idea to deal with higher density neighbourhoods with many resident dog owners and busy bike-pedestrian paths.
Many will attempt to make a living by foraging here in the woods, looking for mushrooms that will bring in good money.
The dreaded cliché, "Ignorance is bliss", is frighteningly true. Some folk love to impersonate an ostrich. They delight in not reading books or following television debates. They derive freedom in having no or too few moral convictions, spiritual precepts or intelligent political ideas. They simply exist, almost sloth-like, in a near-vacuous state of inertia. They hope life will reward them with a modicum of food, drink, sex, sleep and an untaxing hobby like watching a local game of soccer.
“It would be just as easy for us if Mr. Black was not allowed to come to Canada but that was not the judgment of those that administer the law,” he said in response to Mulcair.
Now, this is saying a lot, given that Kim is very good at striking red glass! She regularly uses Effetre Striking Red, which is probably the most comparable to these two shades.
MVT: The bookends of the film, in particular the opening sequence of the film, the first of three endings we are treated to, as well as the wonderful banter between Dick Martin and the other members of the cast. On Rowan & Martin's Laugh-In, Martin was notorious for playing the dope and the trouble-maker of the comedy team, and Dan Rowan -- the nice guy alpha. The roles are reversed here in The Maltese Bippy, and critics ultimately had a major problem with that aspect of this film. Bippy is very funny... However strange it is.
He bowed.
3. the teaching of sex and homosexuality to children
For a long time I had the UK DVD release of Rancho Notorious from Optimum, and it was never particularly satisfying – soft and with washed out colours. The movie then came out in the US as part of the Warner Archive series, sporting an altogether stronger transfer. Since then, I picked up the French release by Films Sans Frontieres which I’m very happy with. It’s a significant improvement on my old Optimum disc and, judging from screencaps, looks very close to the quality of the Archive disc. It’s sharper and more colourful but there’s still some print damage on view. Forced subtitles on the English track are always a concern with French releases but this disc allows them to be disabled via the setup menu. Rancho Notorious isn’t one of Fritz Lang’s better regarded films and tends to be criticised quite a lot. I think this is a little unfair; while it may not be his best work it’s still very entertaining. Much of the problem may come down to a question of expectations, with the film suffering from viewers approaching it with the thought that they will be getting a standard oater. If you accept that you’re in for a piece of high melodrama in a stylized western setting then the movie is unlikely to disappoint.
Empire of the Sun
We found that the Trust’s specific contributions to the field have been notable in four areas:
Its too rat's tail-y! So theres virtually nothing to loosen, so at the roots you're left with a nice wave, but at the ends theres hardly any wave at all and it doesn't look much different from the above picture.. no, not nice is it!
-i put my fall decorations out at the beginning of october so when november rolls around, i start putting out christmas stuff.
It was the school nurse. I sighed, feeling sure in my bones that the OG's congestion had morphed into some little fever, AGAIN, and that I was going to have to go get her.
Escaping deeper into my breathing and concentrating on every breath I wondered what it would be like if I added sound to the breath. Around me the scene had a tone. Not being a musician I didn’t know what the note, key or harmonic was. But in my exhales I matched the tone and the harmonic that I felt. IN a short period of time the tone I emitted was in complete harmony with the tone coming from the life around me.
For me the salient point here is that we are to be like Jesus and in this passage we hear that Jesus gave up his rights; his right to heaven, his right to earth, his right to be served. We live in a culture that values its rights above all else, particularly when things go wrong or get tough. We stand in our rights to make sure we are not disadvantaged in any way. Our rights are enshrined in our laws and the power of law is so often called upon to effect what we believe is a just outcome. yet, we are instructed here to have the ‘same mindset’ as Christ who forwent his rights and became a servant. he did not have them eroded or stripped away but he relinquished them. He did this knowing full well the potential cost but believing in a higher order of things in which, at the hand of God, he would be shown to be right and ultimately what is rightfully his has been restored to him.
to whisper gentle in our ear,
Since long ago, I really liked dancing and I think I was very influenced by seeing my grandmother dance on stage.
A cold breeze moving the hair on the back of my neck and making me shiver
Charlotte has sensitive skin. All my kids do. For overnight diaper use, we like to use a stay dry fabric next to her skin to make sure no rashes arise. During the Flats Challenge back in May, I started to think about using flats as our main diapering stash. The thing I really appreciate about flats and prefolds is their simplicity. Yes, there are a myriad of different folds but I really love the simplicity of a 2 part diapering system. (That sounds like an oxymoron). Yes, you can have simplicity in a two part diapering system. You can use one cover until it is soiled (this cuts down on laundry), just change out the insert. Anyways, the thing that prefolds and flats are missing is the stay dry element. Fancy Cloth Baby has a solution! Christine has created a stay dry liner with a pocket that can be stuffed with a prefold, flat or another insert and laid into a cover. Genius! More on these liners in the review.
Bottom line: Sherlock is good. Enola is better. Girl power to the rescue!
Interviews by Judy Redder, KISCO Creative Services Officer
Then I told him to wait because I knew my doctor would tell me to drink something and lie down.
Scott: No, it's 'T'. 'T' for Tommy. 'T' for Tango.
4-4-2: GK:Jones, LB:Judd, CB:Brown, CB:Hurst, RB:S.Hewitt (Esfandiari), RM:Ingram (Allen), CM:Barnett, CM:K.Hewitt, LM:Pye, CF:Schwodler (Fielder), CF:Rowe
I've lived in Lanzarote since October 2009 and during that time, I've walked all round the coast, and up many of the accessible mountains. Some of the walks I've done are taken from various guide books, others were just a case of looking at the map and going for it. I hope eventually to complete my circumnavigation, and climb all the mountains! Sometimes I walk alone, (although nowadays only in the places frequented by others!) sometimes with one or two friends, and sometimes with the walking group of which I'm a member.
How am I to respond to my sinful preoccupation?
Vueling flights offer a wealth of onward connections available via Vueling’s successful Barcelona Hub operations, currently accessing over 40 destinations in Europe and North-Africa, with full baggage through check-in from Cardiff Airport to final destination.
They will simply turn up for the free food and goodies before return to their own cliques as before – do you call this “integration”?
So it took a while. I ordered our new oil-rubbed bronze beauties from an online source called Your Home Supply. A sweet reader recommend them and their prices were pretty fantastic. Almost half of what I found at hardware stores.
b.) I’m basically a cartoon!
The use of Orange in the lower left section symbolises Swine flu and other viruses… yeah right! I got luck with a spray can.
“Elizabeth Abigail Brown, where are you?”
I really came to love Donaldsonville, and I think that helped enrich my fictionalization of the town. I hope in some small way my book can raise awareness of their struggle for cleaner air/water/soil.
Ø Participation in our monthly blog hops and contests is required.
Another issue covered in Bleeding Violet is that of identity. Specifically, racial identity. Hanna's mother, Rosalee, is black, and her father, Joosef, is a Fin. Hanna spent the first years of her life in Finland, without her mother, and knows a lot more about Finnish culture, and references are made throughout the book. At one point in the book, Rosalee makes her a meal, and there's something on her plate she doesn't recognise. When Rosalee tells her it's Grits, she asks "Is it a black thing?" There's an underlying, very subtle thread of Hanna feeling like she's only half herself, for not knowing about her black heritage, and for not having her mother around, but also that she's an outsider because of her Finnish background, and the cultural differences between her and her peers.
love creates fights
So, I've painted a primer coat of white on everything. Then I painted the front of all of the drawers with brown chalk board paint. (She loves that!)
It seems the reality has checked out. Even ambulance crews are calling us to attend when there is a slightly ‘iffy’ address, or the nearest one is at least an hour away- no wonder we are losing our goodwill and normally we are lucky if even the fire service acknowledge our existence.
But who’s going to answer these fundamental questions?
Face, but preface, not efface.
Pumpkin with homemade yoghurt
Recently, at one of my deejay gigs, I got a request for the song “P Control”, a song I still hear being played at parties. Some women just can’t get enough that song. I can still hear them now, “Pussy controooool!!!”
As a full-time college student I could really use all the help I can get.
In my previous post, Bandersnatch asked the following:
Like a living soul, remembering
-1/2 cup feta cheese
The question I always ask in these situations and no one ever answers: Why do I (or anyone) have to be polite when we are offended? If someone offends me with racism (either unconscious or deliberate) why should I be nice while confronting them? No one has given an answer to me yet because the answer is for the accused’s comfort level, which brings me back around to the title of this post. It is a privilege to expect someone to confront you on any kind of prejudice politely! I go through every day knowing that I will be offended and there is no politeness when it happens but in return I have to be nice? I have to be polite? I have to be willing to teach you is what is really being said.
With silicone and poetry
Lemon Juice : 1tbsp
KH: And Sigur Rós of course. My favourite Icelandic rock band is Sudden Weather Change. They are kind of big in Iceland, but nobody knows them outside.
Plus it’s just nice to be able to “talk shop” with people that are going through some of the same struggles or who are experiencing the same triumphs. I enjoy the new perspective.
This week I have a whole slew of new products for you, and can I just say... It has been SO fun getting these together! It's really made me think about life, change, and making a better tomorrow.. I hope you will find just as much pleasure in them as I do.. So let's get to it!
moving so slowly.
Look how hearty and serene it looks, as if in a yoga pose, so wise and content here on the hill, undisturbed. I focus on these wonderful examples of wild plants instead of the violets and dandelions, perhaps because they are rare and exotic to me, because they are indigenous to this region and make the two acre Eden more diverse and interesting, and especially because they are the result of my knowing this property so intimately that I notice when a new plant arrives on the wind.
As stories will be from ink marks.
“Yep,” I said.
Coming from a renowned boarding school in Kuala Kangsar, I am privy to some info from old boys who are pro-government supporters as well as from those who oppose. With 9th January looming on the weekend’s horizon (I am writing this on a Saturday while waiting for my wife to finish making her Mee Tomato), the story of succession in both PKR and Pakatan Rakyat in general, comes to mind. It is interesting to note that some people in PKR’s up there has hinted that the Youth Chief of PKR, Shamsul Iskandar Mohd Akin, will take over the helm. Nurul Izzah, the daughter of Anwar Ibrahim, is being promoted by her mother, Dr Wan Azizah, much to the behest of Anwar’s long-time loyal-for-some-fishy-reason lieutenant, Azmin Ali, who wants the Party’s No.1 position all to himself, while the name of Badrul Hisham Shaharin, Rembau’s PKR’s Chief, was not mentioned at all. Badrul Hisham lost in his bid for the No.1 Youth’s position to incumbent Shamsul Iskandar, and therefore does not have the locus standi (if I may use that term) to stake his claim at the National level.
Expressions Bronzing Powder Brush
"there is no way this is real."
Price
I'm not angry or hurt over this, interestingly. I figure this little photo is not my Mona Lisa, is not my defining piece of work. It's a snapshot, taken on a whim. I just didn't know it would be so in demand. I actually like the attention, and who wouldn't? I can point (as I just did) to several places where my work has some worth to someone. Oh sure, I could ask for money for it, but what would that get me? Nothing. No money, and no exposure. No one is going to pay for a photo of a handful of plastic when they can steal it elsewhere. At least this way my name is attached to, oh, maybe a quarter of its use.
The Bible ceases to be authority if Jesus Christ or one of His angels could add to it. That takes care of the so-called prophets who think they can tell man something God has told them apart from the written revelation. Need I remind you of Romans 3:4; “Let God be true, but every man a liar.”
“Repeated research on speed limits consistently shows that the most appropriate, safe and enforceable speed limit will be within 5 mph of the 85th percentile speed,” the study reads.
I was stumped. I did not have any vellum sheets in the house, so I was creatively stuck. But vellum stickers to the rescue!!! So I chose to cut a banner out and stick it onto pink cardstock and there I had it...vellum!
including some
Here we are not saying that the baby's life is less important than that of the mother, but simply (since the baby will die regardless) that it is better to intervene to save one life rather than to stand by and watch two people die. Even in these situations it is often possible to deliver the baby alive in such a way that the parents can have some short time to bond with it and say their goodbyes.
Off to eBay I went.... I thought I would show you how easy it was to list my "Lot" of Sims 2 PC games. A "lot" of items is exactly as it sounds, multiples/many of the same type of thing grouped into one single listing.
gut and wash clean (we could probably use tallapia fillets or the like)
Case for a Creator
P.S. Probably no 16 & Pregnant recap tomorrow. My brother and his family will be rolling through this way on their way back home and, unless they get here super late, I'll be chilling with my fam rather than listening to whiney teenagers.
The woman is being charged with capital murder for the death of her son. She was treated at the hospital and is being held on a million dollar bail.
Edward ka-Spel's lyrcs suggest melancholia, withdrawl, delirium (one song is called "Thursday Night Fever"). More often they're a liquefaction of language: like
For example, to calculate the CPM for a newspaper, take the cost of an ad divided by the news­paper’s circulation in thousands. However, this assumes that everyone who gets the newspaper has seen the ad, which is preposterous.
Pete Kennaugh – Touted as a potential Tour de France winner for the future, the young manx-man has yet to show too much. Still young and learning his way. Expect to see him at the smaller races as he learns his race-craft.
Perhaps even teach about it? Shapiro doesn’t go that far, but the permissibility of admitting the truth even to young people would seem to follow from his premise:
Kent Stowell calls his version of “Cinderella” a restoration to the Romantic, and he added levity to Prokofiev’s somber original score by inserting a handful of incidental musical pieces by the composer. The 18th-century-style Tony Straiges’ sets are just what you’d expect: high hearth, glowing white horse and carriage, dappled wooded path, etc. Instant fairytale.
The criticism, by Eduardo Seda Bonilla, was one that hit me to the core, for many reasons. The first thing that had to be done, to describe the novel’s situation, was to first describe what Bonilla believes Puerto Rican culture to be, and what does it have to do in relation to migration. The main point of Soto’s novel was to show the experience of a Puerto Rican teenager, traveling back to PR after having been raised in NYC at the age of eight, visiting his brother who has decided to settle in PR and reject everything about the United States. Beyond the novel itself, because that wasn’t really what was discussed between Lopez and I, neither of us had heard of Soto (but we are going to find that book, no doubt), we discussed on what Bonilla termed Puerto Rican.
I don't know when I started using the phrase, 'for the love', but it's a staple in our household.
3. Eat at least 1200 calories so the rest of the day is easier
However pleased I am with the results from the national election, it's of course bittersweet on the local level. We lost two hard-fought campaigns for the U.S. House and Senate, and this state still remains reliably red, thumbing its nose in the face of an entire NATION shifting the other direction. Baby steps, I suppose.
Owen is now feeling so much better. He has gone from this:
Believe me that the difference between a Seventies jeans pattern, an Eighties jeans pattern, and a 2011 jeans pattern is so slight, and the adjustments needed so minor, that I'm tempted to just say go out and get whatever jeans pattern you can find.
and powerful nerves and channels such as
Maintain a peak state from here on in. Remember, language, focus, physiology (check out my other posts which talk about this in depth). Regularly review your progress. You might not be on target most of the time but it’s a bit like a missile; they are off target 99% of the time, always being corrected by their navigation system, yet they land with perfect accuracy. Be grateful along the way. Continuously reflect on your progress and celebrate the small achievements on the way.
She returns after a few hours and takes me outside to relieve myself. Then we go to bed.
Although the contrast in style and audience is vast, the pieces are similar in really catering to their audiences. They know who reads their magazines, and they don’t fail to deliver. Neither of these magazines is a “sports magazine,” yet they bring the topic into their world in a manner familiar to their readers. They even utilize similar tropes and rituals to do so; they just use them slightly different, showing just how diverse writing can be.
Take a walk on one of 18 kilometres marked trails in unspoiled countryside or relax while driving on electric boat or small train. Only 2 hours from Zagreb, do not miss the opportunity for unique experience that attract visitors from all over the globe.
“I’d hoped to have more information by the time you arrived, but the police are still investigating. Everything has happened so quickly.” Grayson played the moment and indicated the concierge’s office with a gesture. Taking Corliss’ arm, he said, “Let’s talk in private.”
People or drink. Courage is no good:
Update: I’ve written a comment below responding to some questions and clarifying my point a little. Thanks for the feedback, everyone!
The simplest synths to program are also the most popular. They're called analogue or sometimes analogue modelling synths because they're based on original synth design ideas, but updated to use your computer instead of transistors. A lot of synths you cant even tell the difference from the original to the vst).
C fell asleep in the stroller, so while B and E played and explored, I sat and enjoyed the sun (and wished I'd brought my notebook and pen... I am behind on my word count and really want to get this first draft finished!)
Yes, I do wish I had studied. But I know that Allah had His own plans for me. That they didn’t fit in with my own plans for myself, well that was something I’d have to make peace with.
i feel like i'm drowning. i can't climb out of the whole i'm in.
AAM: That is exactly correct. You can think of it as keeping two feet firmly on the ground.
I ran my hand along the railing. This was major. I mean, bumping people out of my way was one thing, but bending metal? This was serious.
You. Must. Play. This. Game.
Someday, when I have the time to get more involved in other people's blogs again, I'll pull this one back out of obscurity. But it won't be for awhile. Like when my kids are all in school and I have a solid 8 hours to myself. That's a few years off. (Unless Ethan decides to fast track like Xander did. I don't see that happening, but life is full of surprises.)
DaJuan Hodges, 29, New York, N.Y.
“Patient has two teenage children but no other abnormalities.”
Since we moved in, I've kept my China, craft supplies, and other random things that I couldn't find a home for in the lower cabinets.
My Mum (aka Nanny G) arrives for a 12 day visit this Thursday which we are all really looking forward to... especially as she hasn't seen Allegra since she was 7 1/2 weeks old! Allegra and I will then fly back to Melbourne with her for a few weeks over easter to visit family and friends yippee! Although it's such a bummer that Mr B will be unable to join us due to work committments :( However, it will be a very special visit for us none the less as on of my closest and best friends, Emma (I have blogged about her previously here and here), is due with her first bubba... the day we arrive actually! I am SOOO excited. It is something all best friends dream of isn't it, to raise their children together?! Such a blessing!
“Funny. Funny days!” said the SomCom in a computerish voice.
It's that time of year again. That time of year when all the corporate monkeys who happen to belong to my particular corporate zoo are expected to write up a report about how we did, what makes us awesome, and why (should the corporate gods decide that they made enough millions for the fiscal year) we should get a raise and/or bonus.
The EPA and Corps have published new regulations expanding the term “Navigable” so it could cover a bird feeder in your back yard. Don’t let the EPA and Corps get away with expanding their own jurisdiction and undermining the limits Congress placed on them by limiting their Jurisdiction to “Navigable Waters” in the Clean Water Act.
Sime Darby was also asked if there was a breakdown of risk management within the group. Musa said the same question had been raised in the working group as the Bakun project had stated in 2002, while the Qatar projects first began in 2005. “But note that these are very long and complex technical projects. But we do acknowledge that there should have been better controls in place.”
Is it fair to say I read 5 books this month? One was really a long short story, and another I ended up skimming so I could return it to the library on time. Well, all reading should count, I think. Here’s the rundown of the month’s books.
*The Christmas Horse image is copyright Annie Tempest.
No obligations just leave a message and I will announce the winner on March 5.
Unruly as a child, he was expelled from school three times and ran away from home aged 12. He never returned, either to home or to school, but began sketching shoes in his early teens.
North Coast Old Rasputin; Fort Bragg, California, Imperial Stout, 9%
My luck just got better.
Maya Finnegan has a job she loves, being the intendant at the Vallon Hospital;
2. Quest options – Something I’ve always wanted in an MMO is a little more flexibility with how you handle questing. Essentially, the option to give Item X to NPC Z instead of NPC Y for a different reward. The ‘standard formula’ has never truly allowed this — you always give Item X to NPC Y for Reward A, B or C.
Even if these kids walk out of a party, the question must be asked.
tolling loud the bright bronze tones
I don’t think I have enough words to say, or explain, except to finish by saying this is a place of great grace and if you are a survivor of sexual violence then I recommend BRISSC as a safe place.
Playing poker or gambling is not the essence of untruthfulness! Still, gambling is based on bluffing, cheating, tricking, or just risking what is comparatively real (money) on something comparatively unreal (dice). Thus to restore the principle of truthfulness we would do well to avoid such behavior, but a game of cards, or a bluff at stealing second base in a game of baseball does not make one a “sinner.” Simply put, we must not tell lies, must keep promises, fulfill responsibilities, disclose the truth plainly but with good manners and sensitivity, and not risk what is real for the sake of what is unreal.
I’m not disputing Gene Chizik’s math, but there are some other factors that influence that ratio as well. Like the transfer of Mike Dyer. And four players kicked off of the team for a little run in with the law.
you were just telling yourself
1999
“The congregation’s request to be dismissed to ECO will come before the presbytery at its next meeting, which is June 16th.”
Why? Because they are my friends. They have sparked thoughts and emotions in my heart and I can hold them in my hands and treasure them as long as I live. One day they will be in the hands of my children and grandchildren and in a way, they will be holding a piece of me.
Where do you find that the “new earth” is spoken of as “not made with hands”?
Don't forget... it's almost time for PLG #14!! Coming very very soon!! So stay tuned! Or if you are like me... go to bed and then check us out in the morning with your cup of coffee!! :-)
From the first upbeat rock styled note of their song The Banner, which is the first song on the CD to last the well written and stylishly performed rap song Hope Has Wings, this CD is pure Christian music pleasure.
Unfortunately, like everything else on Facebook, some people feel the need to overdo it. I have several “friends” on there who regularly who post dozens of these little posters of deep-thoughts every day. It’s like they have an all-you-can eat pass from the dorm poster store. I can barely keep track of how my other friend’s quest for magic unicorn eggs in Castleville is going without these cloying posters popping up every 30 seconds. The implied “cleverness” of the person who posted it is also kind of annoying, as they didn’t actually do much more than browse at a virtual card shop and click a key on a laptop. Friends then “like” the little quote as if the person who clicked first had some sort of creative stake in the process. The fact that this person clicks on more posters in a given day than most people even have time to read gives a more accurate reflection of how little they actually put into it.
Exhibit A in this assertion: today's Sunday Times Edition, which includes no fewer than 6 - SIX - full-on pro-homo propaganda puff pieces.
Recently I made a couple of trips to Glendora, MS with my good friend Deshaun Davis to do some discovery on a potential film project about the tragedy of Emmett Till. For those who may not know that story, please click here.
Slave reparations seem only fair,
Running in circles and chasing their own tales,
Minutes after Fields was found, police discovered two men with gunshot wounds in another yard two blocks away. They were taken to hospitals in critical condition but were expected to survive, police said. Their names have not been released.
Women's
- 2 tbsp parsley or any of your favorite herb, minced
Chetan Bhagat’s books sell so fast that it makes me question the reader’s intelligence. Why are Indians reading meaningless gibberish when they have so many other authors offering them true literature on a platter?
I think the tools of philosopher are dusty. Few people slog through Aristotle and Heidegger and reflect on the meaning of existence from an armchair when careers and social obligations impose responsibilities. Moreover, we never have a chance to think: television, smart phones, and iPods assure a constant distraction. Lastly, our culture does not respect philosophy. It doesn’t provide a job or a material payoff, it only forces us to think harder and longer on things that most people don’t bother with at all. Some people even find it annoying, much like the Athenians found Socrates.
Is there anything more that our dear, heroic national treasure can offer this country. The short answer is yes. He’s going to run for parliament, in Treasure Wayne Swan’s seat of Lilley, and perform a heroic public service for the national good.
I forgive you – You are forgiven. But there is nothing that needs to be forgiven.
In the meanwhile bring 1 cup water to a boil. Add the chopped straberries. Let it cook for a while. Then add sugar. Bring the pot to simmer. Simmer it until the water reduces to ½ the cup. Switch off the flame and add the lemon zest. When the syrup is completely cooled, strain it through a fine sieve.
“You broke his fucking nose,” she told Violet.
Inside the boat was a coffee pot and a cameo brooch and Alfred, forty-ish, with beard and bent nose. He had stolen the boat from a woman who’d robbed him in a bar-room wager. He had been jittery, his judgement had lapsed – but it did not matter. He had the boat and it was all about the race, now, all about the win, all about the gamble, all about the cheat.
The end of the year is right around the corner!
Last night, he was very unsettled, barking away at the back fence until midnight. The boys tried to settle him; I went out with the 'cross mummy' voice because I was already tired from a long day; we tried ignoring it ... nothing.
It's good to want things. At least that's what I tell my children when they barrage me with requests. When we want things, we reach for them. We set goals and we work toward them. Wanting moves us forward.
Accessories: Ornate flowers EF (Sizzix), sponge, medium branch punch (Martha Stewart), ribbon, adhesive pearls, flowers (Michaels), Labdls 9 dies(Spellbinders), pearl string (my stash), Prismacolor pencils, mineral spirits.
In a large bowl, using a stand mixer fitted with a paddle attachment or using a hand mixer, cream the goat cheese on medium-high speed until light. Beat in the sour cream, egg yolks, mustard, salt, nutmeg, pepper and chives until combined. Set aside.
Or shall I choose the dark path? Become a plague to my fellow man? Visit upon him sores and pestilence and endless irritation?
It’s a good time for Canadian advertisers to make the move because the loonie (that’s the Canadian $1 gold colored coin) is near par with the U.S. — it was 65 cents for many years. That makes Canada more expensive for American visitors and college students (who pay non-resident fees, often four times higher), but still well worth a look.
The key to practicing building relationships is getting to know everyone you interact with on a regular basis. Network with the people you know and then look for more people to network with. You never know who is going to lead you to that next introduction that changes your life. Maybe they know someone at that company you are trying to land as the next big account or maybe their friend is a business owner looking for employees while you sit around looking for work. The more exposure you can get the more likely you are to meet someone who can help you accomplish your goals.
2 TBSP hoisin sauce
The final artwork now looks like this, where the boy and the cat are both lighted correctly and ready for a background.
“A friend is someone you want to be around even when you want to be by yourself.”
It's busy times here at the moment... trying to deal with all the housing changes to come... we settle on the 8th of June for the house we are purchasing... not that far away now... exciting but scary! I am really looking forward to having more space - and particularly a separate Mad for MArkers/ crafting room! Yipee!!
1. How is a Mrs. Bissessar led UNC government going to assure the people of T&T that the UNC is truly a party of diversity?
I am Brian B. I'm a 42 year old recovering addict/alcoholic. I am married, and have 5, yes 5 beautiful children. Only one of which is my step son. 3 boys ages 5,15,21 and 2 girls both 15. My boys all live with my wife and I, and my girls, both from different mothers, live with there mothers. My wife Tracie, is my high-school sweetie, we have been together for over 25 years off and on. We finally got married in October of 2008. WOW, who would have thunk it! Tracie is an RN at a local hospitol, and I have been doing construction for most of my adult life, when I could, I have not worked in 5 years. We decided that I would be a stay at home dad when we had our youngest child. For anyone out there that thinks being a stay at home dad is easy- Blow-me! It's just not for me. I have made the commitment to do it though, and it's coming to an end. Lil Brian will start Kindergarten this Fall.
detective turned private investigator Kate Garrett, soldier turned PI Jake Carmedy and Chief of Detectives Igor Thorsen played out a scene that I may still use in a future book. I wrote several story fragments developing their characters and adding several others, but mostly Carmedy and Garrett stayed on
Because I was recovering so well, my doctor was able to release both Sariah and I within 24 hours after delivery. We were anxious to be able to get home and be with our family. Hospitals are just not that comfortable to stay in. My mom was able to meet us at the hospital just before we were released. She was able to help us pack things up and get ready to go home. We dressed Sariah in a pink sleeper that said "LOVE" and left her purple bow in that Dad picked out. I forgot how little newborns are! She looked so darn cute in her outfit and we couldn't wait to bring her home!
Marla Crawford says it seems to her like “double jeopardy and them taking what they want.”
Melkote, S.R. 1991. Communication for Development in the Third world: Theory and Practice. New Delhi, Sage.
It was kind of obnoxious.
“We’re seeing kids with respiratory symptoms from homes where meth is used or manufactured,” Wells said.
Widely regarded as one of the most respected and sought-after musicians in the music world, Brazilian-born Eumir Deodato has racked up 16 platinum records to his credit as artist, arranger or producer with combined sales of well over 25 million records in the USA alone. His discography, including compilations and all his work as arranger, producer and keyboardist, surpasses 450 albums. He has also had the honor of performing with the St. Louis Symphony (which backed him on his superb Artistry album), the Cincinnati Symphony, the New York Philharmonic and the Orchestra di Musica Leggera dell'Unione Musicisti di Roma. In addition, several artists over the years have covered his songs, including George Benson, Lee Ritenour, Sarah Vaughan and The Emotions to mention just a few. And yet, in spite of all of his varied triumphs, honors and distinctions over the years, the multi-talented, multi-instrumentalist will probably forever be associated with one song - his innovative rendition of Richard Strauss' classical opus Also Sprach Zarathustra (or more commonly known as the theme to 2001: A Space Odyssey).
I guess I'll start with its consistency. Bad amateur scripts have one good scene followed by 10 average scenes. Then another good scene, followed by 6 bad scenes. Tyler made sure EVERY – SINGLE – SCENE was worth reading here. There were no bridge scenes. He didn’t take any scenes off. Every single scene mattered. Every single scene was *dramatized.* That’s what was so cool about The Disciple Program. It never allowed you to NOT like it.
Anyway, the reason I’m thankful for karaoke is that toward the end of our meal OGE decided he was done at the restaurant. However we weren’t quite finished. At the same time the karaoke guy (yes karaoke at a Mexican restaurant!!) showed up to set up. He started playing music fairly loud. This didn’t bother us because it drowned out OG’s screaming!!
Actually from a hen point of view this is good news. I had been worried that there might be an egg within an egg, not necessarily a bad thing but something that would require watching the hen for a bit to make sure that all was well in eggland.
And I just had to make my little Archie a card for his 1st birthday, which is today! :D
This one is notable for being willing to wear a costume, but unwilling to give up their favorite flipflops. Life is about compromise, right?
1/4 cup half and half
I am very excited, proud and grateful for this opportunity
As I said before, are a £1.10 half-litre can of Stella, a £4 bottle of wine or a £12 bottle of whisky really “dirt cheap”?
2 note card sets
Verbena's pH is very close to that of the acid mantle of the skin making it a good clarifier. It refines skin texture and may reduce pore size. It seems to suit men as an aftershave since the scent is neither floral nor fruity.
But lucky for me I have two relatively new 'inspirations' in my quilting life. 1) a mini group made up of some very talented quilters, who tend to gravitate more to the artsy non-traditional side than the traditional squares and triangles.... and 2) a new quilting buddy (she is also part of the mini group), who is an artist by trade and has helped me to step outside of my box.
Jenny Hansen's blog is More Cowbell. If you don't get the reference and don't fear the reaper I think you'll find out where her blog title comes from if you go there and look around.
but i totally forgot.
I’ve always been fond of comic book stores since I was but a young brat with a pocketful of babysitting money for Bazooka gum and funny books. For me, was always Mad Magazine, Scrooge McDuck and Richie Rich.
Most people will want the iPhone/Android option, but if you’re poor or cheap, try the computer only option to just test the waters. And don’t think you have to listen at your computer. You can run a wire from your laptop to your stereo system, or you can get a digital media server that bypasses the computer and acts like another component in your stereo cabinet.
What I really liked about Hyundai’s iPhone game is that the users leave with the Hyundai app on their phone which can be used to push content at a later stage and connect with the players after the game.
Musical Direction by Paul Amiel and Dawn Sellers
A crazy meta-pedagogy? Perhaps, but brilliant and successful? Absolutely.
Unlike the McLaren and Saubers set ups, the Ferrari solution does not appear to have the driver interacting with the duct. Instead the wing is fed with airflow coming from an inlet high up on the engine cover, well away from the drivers reach. It is possible that the there is additional ducting inside the car that does allow the driver to control airflow through the duct. But so far no signs of a driver controlled inlet around the cockpit are evident. It could be Ferraris set up uses pure aerodynamics to affect the duct, by choking at high speed (safely well above the maximum corner speed).
May good luck pursue you each morning and night.
Following the break up of Johnny Thunders & The Heartbreakers in 1977, Walter Lure (one of the singer/guitarists in The Heartbreakers) continued to branch out musically. While most people don’t know that he wrote and sang about half the songs in the The Heartbreakers, there are a few additional interesting musical facts that some people may not be aware of. In the 80s he contributed guitar to three Ramones albums at the request of Johnny Ramone (Subterranean Jungle, Too Tough To Die and Animal Boy) in addition to this he played live in his own band that featured a revolving cast of musicians. In 1979 he released a single with a new group that he was part of called The Blessed. The single featured two tracks, “Deep Frenzy” and “American Bandstand”, but his time with the band was short lived. He would play under the name The Hurricanes and The Heroes, who released a single 1978 featuring the members of The Heartbreakers, minus Johnny Thunders which featured the songs “Too Much Junkie Business” and “Seven Day Weekend”. He eventually arrived at the band known as The Waldos.
One 8-ounce bottle of hair conditioner
Run 3 miles Monday and supplement the rest with elliptical, then go about 1/2 and 1/2 the rest of the week.
bed that will go with the furniture. Here are the pictures of
Patterned Paper - My Mind's Eye
I'm only partially moved into my new apartment, but I don't anticipate any more delays that wouldd prevent me from watching these things. Keeping that in mind, my next film is Final Destination, which is a goofy, fun movie that doesn't skimp on the violence in the least. Oh, and I just bought a brand-spankin'-new DVD/Blu-Ray player, which I'm looking forward to breaking in, so if any of you have any suggestions for a good slasher flick to watch on BR, let me know in the Suggestion Box post. See you next week!
That’s 2.5 feet up in the air. I got there. BY MYSELF. Well, I mean, Mom did put the ottoman thingie there so I could use it. BUT! She didn’t have to pick me up to get there, now did she? No. I didn’t think so.
Anyhoo. NOW communications director Lisa Bennet writes:
Delphina cried out, but the wind snatched her words away. I leapt forward and snatched the petal off her cheek.
'Before the wedding night, you paint your one ball red and the other ball blue.
Patterned paper cut into smaller square
Writing is our way of Clashing With Authorities, of beer bonging without the whole shove-this-tube-down-your-esophagus discomfort.
A Little Teamwork, Please
AMERICAN CRAFT BEER WEEK
Lets be “cute” and “girly.”
Saturday I was getting ready to leave for work and our upstairs neighbor knocked on the door (which is pretty unusual for just before 9am). He and his girlfriend are retired and were the very first people we talked to when we moved into our apartment and they are super nice. Anyway, he very gently asked if we knew that our car had been broken into. My immediate response was, "But I have to go to work!"
I hope you will like this one as much as I do. Here it is:
Little Diva Tutus, LLC
2 large cloves garlic, minced
Now let’s look at unfruitfulness. I am sure that you noticed that ἄκαρπος, “unfruitful” is the same word as καρπὸς, “fruitful” or “fruit,” with a ἄ prefix. This the same thing we do in English by putting a prefix of “a” on a word to make it mean the exact opposite. So, if we put the “alpha-negative” on the front of καρπὸς, which means fruitful, we have a word that means “unfruitful, fruitless, barren, or unproductive,” and that is exactly how ἄκαρπος is used in the New Testament. It is found eight times in the New Testament. In the parable of the Sower in Matthew 13 it refers to the “thorny ground hearer.” In the book of Jude it is used to refer to apostates who are “clouds…without water, carried about of winds; trees whose fruit withers, without fruit, twice dead, plucked up by the roots…”
GLAMOUR FIRST IMPRESSION allows foundation to go on smoother and more evenly resulting in better looking and longer-lasting finishes. This product will not compete with foundations, shadows, or other cosmetic product. You will not have that oily shine later in the day, and your makeup payoff will increase significantly. It dries quickly (we recommend a dry time of 30 seconds before applying cosmetics on top).
Song of the Day: Smooth Criminal by Michael Jackson
DWM catches up with the scourge of the Silents, CIA agent Canton Everett Delaware III - aka actors MARK SHEPPARD and his father, Morgan Sheppard - and finds out about making it as an actor, and whether Canton could return...
I’d like to see more public buildings on the high street. Council activity should not be in rarefied big blocks like the town hall. People should be able to engage with it very directly and we don’t need big buildings to do that anymore.
I apologise in advance for the picture heavy upload… the girls and I had a great time making this craft, and I couldn’t decide which pictures to get rid of and which ones to keep, sooo….. LOL! Also… apologies for the sideways pictures… my computer is having issues with rotation apparently. *sigh*
RUEL N, ODELIN MF, JOLLY J, et al. Outbreaks due to respiratory syncytial virus and influenzavirus A/H3N in institutionalized aged. Role of immunological status to influenza vaccine and possible implication of caregivers in the transmission. Presse Medicale 2002; 31: 349-355.
This soap-free cream cleanser is clinically proven to moisturize sensitive skin while gently cleansing away dirt, oil and make-up without over drying or causing redness. This is exactly what I need!
My point is that there is a pattern of unkempt beers at Mather's. The only bad pints I've had in Edinburgh were there. Cask ales are alive need attention and proper cellarmanship. Bar staff needs training on off flavours. But perhaps if they're tasting the off beer regularly, and nobody complains, then they'll think everything is fine.
When one accepts the award they agree to:
Wow! What a great response to our first Allergy-Friendly Lunchbox Love linky party! Thank you to everyone who submitted links to great lunchbox menu ideas, and thanks to all of you who stopped by and browsed through our inspiring submissions. By popular demand, we will definitely be running this link party every Friday... I guess it's not just me who needs new lunchbox ideas!
I'm thankful for all the distractions as I am sorely in need of some new socks. Not the shoes this time! I decided this after 3 days in a row last week where the balls of my feet were on fire after I got finished and 1 day I had a huge blister there. Until I get out to get socks, I will be wearing 2 pairs! I let that go too long! And I am bad about wearing socks around the house. oy! my aching feet!
What can be done to avert such a crisis? The answer is simple:
Kelis walks into our house all of a sudden and starts singing about her milkshakes. La-La La-La La.
Innominus headed to the manor house door, accompanied by Clever Jim, Arkus' guard captain. The door was locked and barred from the inside. They decided to circumvent the whole property, casing the place, and waiting for Innominus' companions to arrive from town.
Last quarter, by a margin of 3-to-2, more banks tightened residential mortgage lending standards for “prime borrowers” than did loosen them.
-Racism is alive and well, only society and the right has gotten better at sending coded messages so that their followers can convince themselves that they’re not actually racist.
Kan I, Melamed E, Offen D, Green P.
This Pantheon of Greats is much averse to innovation,
What a question! Did I trust him? Of course I couldn’t know the answer to that in any meaningful way. I knew him better than some people and a lot less well than others. We had just had sex for the first time. I knew his name, his job, his star sign. I knew he played tennis but hated football. I knew he laughed at Monty Python and hated all politicians. I knew he liked to drink beer and smoke an occasional spliff. But I had no idea if he had ever committed a serious crime, if he could be violent, if he had ever stalked anybody…
Their father tugged at one of his earlobes. "How do you get there... well, it's complicated."
MA: What's Rebekah Brooks like? I was reading a bio of Elizabeth I recently - flame-haired, dissembling, paranoid, rarely ate. While others feasted on 10 course meals, Elizabeth would sit there picking away and imagining ills after a workaholic day of the screaming abdabs. Beating up poor Cecil. Does Rebekah call you late at night from Chipping Norton and tell you to behave yourself?
11. Spazz - B-Street Butta
Cheryl Cole‘s love life is on the up following her ‘Pride of Britain Awards‘ sponsored trip to Afghanistan last week. She got friendly with Royal Marine Andy ‘Bagsy’ Baker during her visit to Camp Bastion, and took his number.
Sometimes this thing still pops into my head. Reactions from some women leave me wondering, too. While I do have some notions, the truth that I know is when you dip your toe into that type of pool you never know where you will end up. The simple, and even complex, relationships with women have shown me this. Women don't lead, they influence... and confuse. A simple drive to the store, and what you would do alone, becomes some... long drive to two or three stores, the purchase of the items you were after and food for a picnic, then a day out somewhere... rather than a quick pick-up, delivery, and... nap. A simple kiss and pat can end up with you being in traction. :p
I think it’s supposed to be the 5G of lunch bags, though it could just as easily serve as luggage for a five-week business trip to The Hague. It has zippers, it has mesh netting, it has an insulated interior and it has what looks like shoelaces strapped across the top, where I guess you can cram anything that couldn’t fit on the inside. It even has our company logo emblazoned on a nylon strip across the front.
8. begging
Paul’s supporters call his campaign the “Ron Paul Revolution,” and they turned out in a steady, hard rain outside the hall where the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution were debated and adopted.
I even added two shift registers with 8 LEDS and a BCD 8 segment display to compliment it. The purpose would be to display the sensor number, and if it is in a good range or not. I will mount this so that the driver can see it and monitor it. If a temperature or voltage exceeds the threshold in a dangerous way (over temp), It will not only sound an alarm, but light the small decimal point of the BCD so that I know something is up. I need to add sleep code, but that’s about it (and controlling the power rail of the BT serial, SD, GPS, and LEDs with a mosfet).
He's all I 've wanted all my life and even more
Ohoho, now this is funny. Wasn’t it like, one guy who did that?
splattered paint where you were too
67.363842, 26.630384
with which to strut the bounds
Love that's never failing;
There are many new lessons about adding and subtracting within 20, and adding and subtracting two-digit numbers without regrouping, explaining basic mental math principles.
As I listened to the words
Teoh was assisting the commission in investigations pertaining to alleged misappropriation of allocations involving several Selangor assemblymen.
In some places, a cloth is held in front of the plant, which acts like a screen, while mantras are chanted. At the end of the mantra recitation, the cloth is removed as a mark of culmination of the wedding.
morning bomb blasts that
For those in foreign countries you can translate this into your native language and send it to your friends to include them. Just try and stay as close and true as you can to the meaning of this information. You can leave out the testimonials in your translation.
Antony Billington
Here’s a little montage I’ve put together of footage from our 77-day journey—the West Coast of Vancouver Island to the eastern-most tip of North America. 77 days, 12 hours of footage, crammed into 9 minutes. It hardly does justice, and I’m not the best filmmaker, but I try. Check it out if you have the time.
The fossil pictured shows that Pedilid beetles have remained unchanged for millions of years. Pedilid beetles, still identical to present-day specimens despite all the intervening years, tell us that the theory of evolution is a terrible deception.
Sometimes, a little disorder is in order. Sometimes, what we need is a little superfluous complication, just to keep things interesting.
Denis P. Germain, 33, Tuxedo Park, N.Y.
Well, the thing is that in most cases, those little things that you do to a brother or sister stays with them from the second you say it throughout your whole life and their whole life as well.
That is about it for today. Have fun and I will try to be back soon.
Your request for the documents for an Exempt study is new. You had not stated any such requirement previously. I have attached the IRB checklist page indicating that the IRB does not require a filing in my case, as we had already discussed.
The theme for issue 7, DARK+STORMY will come with a collector’s special edition slipcase, only 25 of which will be available for purchase worldwide at select locations.
I remember when I first met him. We both worked at Kmart in 2002. I was 17 and in my Senior year of High School, he was 21 and going to school at KVCC. Ill admit, I didn't really like him at first. I kind of thought he was weird, and he was older and not really "my type"....as if I really had a "type".....
“The quality of the women I’ve met through them is much higher than on online dating sites,” said Jim, a happy client who has been on 15 dates so far.
If one of these ideas will help you, let me know by leaving a comment below.
Yudhisthira came up to Bhishma and told him that all of them had assembled there at the appointed hour and asked him if he could be of any service to him at all.
lots of mozzarella and parmesan
"Religious people may continue to believe that marriage can be only between a man and a woman. That is not the state’s view. We do not take the Orwellian view that “All animals are equal but some animals are more equal than others”." Mrs Featherstone has made an absurd gaffe regarding George Orwell's Animal Farm and its relevance to the definition of marriage. The whole point of Animal Farm is a condemnation of arbitrary redefinitions by the state of fundamental norms in order to serve vested interests. This is exactly what Ms Featherstone is guilty of in her proposed rewriting of the centuries-old understanding of marriage in order to serve the vested interests of the homosexual rights lobby.
With a glassy countenance
Turns out he got a new IPhone and thought (because she was young and should know about them) that she would know how to work it.
A month ago, I blogged about the troubles at Aspen Mountain Press, whose authors report nonpayment of royalties, contract breaches, delayed publication schedules, and other problems; and whose senior staff resigned en masse in early August.
I walked in with purpose in my stride. I went to the magazine aisle, just knowing once again I would leave in defeat. But there it was. One single copy on the top shelf. I hugged it. I told the clerk my little story
Solace 2 fathers/mothers we’ll stand 2gether
pray, be her child and their child in the warm of next year.
“All-in,” was all I could say.
his girl Shaniqua was a home schooled fillet
Anyway, I arrive and walk out to the courtyard/pool area where a guy is on a ladder putting pieces of copper on top of some of the beams. I was friendly, even though when I greeted him he replied with the belligerent toned version of "Can I help you?". I explained that I frequently do odd jobs and maintenance there, and that I would be sure not to interfere with his project.
Back to the point: for each inch of image, we now have 72 sets of three numbers. The three numbers are each converted to binary. So that red pixel is represented by the sequence 01111111,00000000,00000000 - and there are 72 x 72 of these for a square inch of screen image, so you can see the info becomes very extensive very quickly. One letter is represented by just one of those numbers, remember.
Now, many of you will remember the over-the-top albino Silas from the Da Vinci Code, the God’s Work psychokiller memebot. Pretty scary mofo, huh? Well, the sect he supposedly represents is much, much scarier than the Da Vinci parody, and then some. God’s Work does not support evil, it IS evil, reeking of hypocritical self-righteous piousness. Their doctrine in a mfcking nutshell is that god has ordered them to convert the rest of us by steel and fire. Forget the conquistadors, the inquisitors, the fachas and the other psychopaths Made in Spain, they were dilettants compared to the Work. If the conquistadores were the Sword of Roam, God’s Work aspires to be its Ultimate Weapon, its Doomsday Device, in a word: Armageddon.
Both the Incredibly Patient Mother and I have to work today, so any chat will have to wait until evening.
For the cheese, I used Greven Broeker, a cow’s milk cheese from Belgium ($31.95 a pound), for the majority and a little bit of Roquefort, Mons, from France, a raw, sheep’s milk cheese sent from Bedford Cheese Shop. The roquefort has a stronger, hefty tang than the Greven Broeker. I bought the Greven Broeker in November at South End Formaggio in Boston. I opened the wrapping to find the cheese with a slimy coat. It had the color of a very pale beige. But I used it anyway and I’m still here two days later.
Something really cool about her some of her templates is that you can FOLD IT TO MAIL IT!!! I'M NOT EVEN KIDDING!! Isn't that slick?!!
Baby Leg Warmers
And we seniors have to “tighten our belts,” because we aren’t getting a COLA again this year…and none last year!
“For what it’s worth: it’s never too late or, in my case, too early to be whoever you want to be. There’s no time limit, stop whenever you want. You can change or stay the same, there are no rules to this thing. We can make the best or the worst of it. I hope you make the best of it. And I hope you see things that startle you. I hope you feel things you never felt before. I hope you meet people with a different point of view. I hope you live a life you’re proud of. If you find that you’re not, I hope you have the strength to start all over again.”
The Secret of Giving ... GMC ... 9 PM
And thus, a blog was born. And it was totally awesome.
Ketil is a father to several son's who now have wives and families of their own (only the simple-minded Kalvur remains a burden), all of them more upwardly mobile than their father and through these relationships Brú is able to point up the different attitudes that separate the generations. The turf roof that adorns Ketil's house for example and which is in peril during every storm causes barks of frustration from one son who wants him to replace it with one of corrugated iron - 'Fancy having a damn roof that you have to ask folk to sit and hold onto, every time there's a real use for it!' After the frenzy of the whale hunt and the re-location of Kalvur's shoulder by the doctor Ketil makes an offering to him of a whale kidney. It is through the eyes of the doctor's wife that we see the contrast between old world and new.
But among my "travels" while I was recovering, which came down to me spending a week on my couch bored out of my mind trying to find something to watch on Netflix! But the 2nd week I was asked to come down to audition for the Blog This series with Jessica Bern.
It's not unusual that his candy would still be in the cupboard, even month later. After all, I recently threw out Jack's Halloween candy from two years ago, but having a kid who saves his candy is vastly different than having a kid who is no longer here to eat it.
I took some video of the shoot, if only to illustrate an example of extreme kill mail whoring. I will get around to editing it at some point.
Can you see the line in between? Left side was where LEADERS InSolution's mask was placed.
He was held in such high repute for virtue that the people of Jerusalem called him “The Just”; and when the time of the siege came, instead of attributing the frightful punishment they then endured to the deicide they or their fathers had committed, they would have it be a consequence of the murder of James, who, when dying, prayed for his people. The admirable epistle he has left us bears testimony to the gentleness and uprightness of his character. He there teaches us, with the eloquence of an inspired writer, that works must accompany our faith if we would be just with that justice which makes us like our Risen Lord.
We are down to eight school days now, the summer is getting ready to leap into full swing. Teenagers will flood the streets no matter where you go. So I should be thinking about fun summer plans with friends and long nights by the ocean and the bonfire pits, however, that's not what I'm thinking about. This summer is for more serious endeavors.
3. He barks if he sees someone close to the house and I know he would lay down his life for either my husband or I.
Today I attended conferences with both Rex and Riley's teachers at All Saints. We didn't have a conference at Riley's public school preschool since we just had his IEP meeting. I started off with Rex's 2nd grade teacher Mrs Speiring. Rex is doing really well at school. His teacher was also a shy kiddo and so she really understands how important it is for us to encourage him to be brave and to make sure he continues to gain confidence. She has spent these first few months of school getting to know the kids and she really pays attention. I love that his teacher understands how to push him so that he gains more and more confidence in himself and his ability to succeed at school. She is especially impressed with Rex's maturity and patience. I'm apparently a total sap but she made me all teary eyed as she was talking about his ability to be patient and considerate all different types of kids. I'm not exactly sure how Justin and I ended up with a child that is patient but I'll take it.
Thus says The Lord, to the sons and daughters of men: You were brought forth from the dust, yet I gave you a heart of flesh. You were formed in MY image, your body was given life through the breath of The Son… Yet you, My children, have rebelled against Me! You have turned from Me, and run! You run from your own Father, desecrating and destroying all I have given you! Your hearts have grown hard! They are waxed very cold!… A barren wasteland, filled with evil and sin.
1. In the time of health, you must often and seriously remind each other of the time when death will make the separation; and live together daily as those that are still expecting the parting hour….Reprove everything in one another, which would be an unwelcome memory at death. If you see each other dull and slow in heavenliness, or living in vanity, worldliness, or sloth, as if you had forgotten that you must shortly die, stir up one another to do all without delay which the approach of such a day requireth.
The time is upon the Page family. It’s PCS time! Well, coming up in may but we like to start early so things run smoother. For those not familiar with the massive amount of military acronyms we are moving. From the beautiful Hawaii to the east coast. Yes, I will probably freeze to death. Ha!
To make dressing, microwave the peanut butter and honey in a heatproof bowl for 10-20 second, until easy to stir. Add remaining ingredients and whisk to combine.
always a hilarious word
It’s my understanding that many of us, especially those who’ve actually asked for it, “can expect” (1) to go through an opening or a transition in consciousness in the upcoming month. I say this because of a reading I had with Archangel Michael on April 25.
“Sugar, you want what?” The flamboyantly dressed dude said from behind the counter after I placed a bottle of orange juice next the cash register. At first I was rather puzzled, “Joe” the cashier is cool and I had seen him do the very same thing for others when they needed a couple of extra dollars after using their own credit or debit cards. It was only when he pulled down his certified Elton John Fan Club sunglasses and looked over towards the shiny new miniature ATM next the newspaper rack with a smiling Ricky Santorum clone in a suit standing beside it that I understood his reluctance.
The main female protagonist in Defy is Tate. She’s the firstborn daughter of Skye and Caleb from my book Foretold. Her character was largely shaped to be the perfect complement to Zachariah. She also had to be a blend of her parents in personality and appearance, and based upon early reader feedback, I succeeded in that. Tate is adventurous, spontaneous, fun-loving, spirited, good-humored, strong and courageous. Some of those traits get her into quite a bit of trouble, though!
Obama appointees who had to resign, the list so far:
The people reading this takeover news fall loosely into three groups;
For those that follow us on Twitter, its fairly obvious that we’ve been actively stepping up our marketing efforts in order to diversify our list of clients. Love Jenkins Associates have historically dealt with commercial, educational or healthcare clients and have thrived on repeat business, but with the recent and future inevitable cuts and spend reduction we’ve decided to dip back into the domestic market.
The leaking of the Uff Report, the delayed dismissal of the remaining, ‘squeaky-clean’ UdeCOTT Board members and the dissolution of Parliament are all part of a major distraction operation. The fallout from suppressing the Uff Report would have been huge and unpredictable, so the name of the game was spin. That spin is what we have been getting from government ever since we entered the end-game. The ultimate attempt to distract us was of course the dissolution of the Parliament by FAX on Thursday 8th April.
Sorry, that's the best I can say about Dracula (The Dirty Old Man). But for a movie with as many problems as this one has, that's probably giving it a lot of leeway.
I also found this youtube video entertaining (:
and see each girls oh-so-luxe city residence and more:
Of major assistance in the writing of this article were the catalogue essay by Hamza Walker, and the televised broadcast of his discussion with the artist, Rebecca Morris, on CANTV.
Sweep away the sad or the mad. Sweep away hurt feelings. Sweep away whatever it is that you would like out of your home and away from your family. This can be feelings or bad habits or anything you want to be rid of.
My biggest issue is the cinematography, and it was a HUGE issue for me. Lots of quick zooming in and out and shaky, jerky movement. I believe the intent is to make the viewer feel like they’re right there, a part of the action, running right alongside Katniss in the woods, staring at close range right into the face of Effie Trinket, and then suddenly jerking your gaze away and onto something else. All the constant motion and shaking made me very motion sick, however, and I spent the majority of the movie trying very hard not to vomit. I actually had to get up at one point and go sit in the lobby for a few minutes, and I wasn’t sure I would be able to go back into the theater. I did go back, but it wasn’t easy to sit through the rest of the movie feeling extremely nauseous. Now, this could very well be chalked up to my currently being in a delicate condition, but several other people I know who have seen the movie also said that the cinematography was difficult for them, so I would caution anyone who is sensitive to motion sickness about seeing this movie.
For example, let me tell you about the Strepsiptera. Strepsiptera is a taxonomic order of insects with a really weird twist…actually, their common name is the twisted wing parasites. The males are fairly normal looking to a non-entomologist. They have wings, legs, antennae, etc. To entomologist they are very strange because their forewings have been reduced into stubs (similar to the hind wings on the order Diptera/Flies) and they completely lack mouth parts. In their stead, they have even more sensory organs, designed for one thing, to find females. That’s right, ladies and gentlemen, these insects exist solely for the purpose of sex.
One of the most popular and beloved antiques is the hair picture. These hair pictures were devotional objects coveted by families. One of the most common Victorian Valentines featured the symbolic rose or forget-me-not flowers made from hair locks of one's beloved....
And time I did not note.
This is NOT about homosexuality, although in the tenets of Eddie Long’s faith, he is sexually immoral for the action of homosexuality. Eddie Long’s actions are about Child Sexual Abuse, and perfect example of Child Grooming.
As I sat in the back of the Mercedes S600 Sedan tears of longing and remembrance streaked down my face. Yes, this is how life was meant to be. The smell of top grain leather, the sheen of real burl walnut trim, the view of the lesser world as it slips quietly by a well-tuned Bavarian engineered vehicle.
This is another low gen tape of this show I have been sent : the earlier version sounded very good to me but on comparing to this one the right channel had a little distortion. The guitar sounds slightly clearer on the earlier torrent but that is after some minor processing. I am upping this as a raw transfer at this point : I may offer a 'processed' one at some point but the quality of the recording means I would rather wait until a professional mixer I know might have a go at it (depending on his workload) or whether anyone who downloads this who really knows their stuff works on it. I can do minor tweaks (some will disagree of course), but I often prefer the 'widening' process I do on mono-ish recordings (which of course some like, some don't).
“Well, you could give her a piggy back?”
Well over half way now, but the most strenuous part of the walk is just beginning. Three deep water-worn gorges incised in the sandstone – Fairlight Glen, Warren Glen and Ecclesbourne Glen – lie on the path to Hastings. With a kestrel hovering overhead, I begin the descent into Fairlight Glen, gentle at first through gorse and bracken, then dropping steeply into dense oak, hazel and sycamore ancient woodland. The sheltered microclimate, warm and moist, encourages mosses and lichens to proliferate on the oak branches. Steps cut into the steepest part of the slope twist downwards to the nadir of the Glen, and a densely shaded gully, a red-brown slash in the greenery, in which water trickles over jagged angular sandstone boulders, lush ferns on either side.
We know this is a super busy time of year so this challenge will stay open unti Fri 6th Jan at midnight - with a £30 gift voucher on offer....now that would be something to celebrate!
After an initial round of testing, the factor tests are then repeated and refined to get a final value.
The Osa Peninsula is on the South West side of Costa Rica, and home to Corcovado National Park which is described by National Geographic as “the most biologically intense place on earth.” From our travels, it is the first place people (tourists and locals) mention as a must do in Costa Rica. We are staying 2 nights in Puerto Jimenez along the Golfo Dulce to get our National Park passes and lodging reserved before heading 2 hours on a dirt road to Corcovado. Once dropped off by the bus we will walk 30 minutes down the Carate beach where we will be staying 2 nights in a tent cabin at an Eco Lodge near one of the National Park entrances. The lodge practices sustainability and includes meals and showers with water running out of coconut shells (we’ll see what those are like) because the area is so remote. Sounds incredible to us. We hope and expect to see a large array of wildlife both at the lodge and on our hike through the park. The trail we will be taking follows the beach through the rich jungle forest. Already here in Puerto Jimenez we have seen over 10 Scarlet Macaws. They are so loud, bright red, and usually travel in pairs that it is easy to spot them high in the trees.
Also, your new word this week is cheese. You LOVE cheese, and ask for it often:) Today you and your friend Carly were standing in front of the fridge with your arms up saying 'cheese cheese cheese' ha ha - cute
“He might be, ” I answered.
May love and faith abide.
there are a ton of great tutorials on how to plan and execute one.
The (acting) Archdeacon has listened to the complaints of a vociferous few who support same-sex marriage and without giving Mr Gowlland the chance to respond to the allegations has summarily ‘withdrawn’ Mr Gowlland’s licence to preach and lead worship for two months, but this doesn’t amount to suspension. And, moreover, the (acting) Archdeacon has done this during a interregnum, when the church needs all the lay expertise it can muster.
Here in Berlin it brings the people out. Many of us have been trapped inside for months now. The winter weather in the Hauptstadt is simply put, not pleasant. Temperatures hovering at the 0 mark (32F) for months on end, a gray blanket which serves as a sky shielding us from the sun; these things are considered normal through the harsh Berlin winter.
and Izzy have been best friends their whole lives. And they've always agreed on one goal: to get out of tiny Paris, Texas, and see the world. The school's foreign exchange program seems like the perfect escape: Piper will go to the original Paris; Mei will go to China; Cassidy will go to Australia; and Izzy, unable to afford the program, will stay at home. To add spice to their semester away, and to stay connected to their best friends, the girls start The International Kissing Club, a Facebook page where they can anonymously update one another and brag about all the amazing guys they're meeting. After all, these girls are traveling abroad: amazing guys abound at every turn! But sometimes fun, flirty vacation flings turn into more serious romances, and sometimes you don't return from abroad the same person you were. Will the girls'
the path off in the wrong direction
Hi, The Cuttlebug Challenge for this week is to design a card using an image, a bow and at least 2 buttons. Whoopsi Daisy is sponsoring this challenge with their digital images, and as I love colouring, I thought I'd check them out. I couldn't resist this one - isn't she just gorgeous.
The quote at the beginning of this blog post is from Goodnight Moon written by Margaret Wise Brown in 1947. The story is about a bunny who doesn’t really want to go to bed and so begins the ritual of saying good night to every single object in the room. The book doesn’t really have a plot but is more of a night-time litany. The pictures are colorful and have lots of details and it’s fun for children to notice and point out those details when they get older. There is something very soothing about the rhythmic rhyming text. It is almost like a lullaby. Although adults may get tired of the book most children I’ve read it to have requested it again and again.
The holiday season is in full swing and we’re headed full throttle for Christmas. Those Halloween treat baskets are a distant memory. The pecan pie, stuffed turkey and candied yams of Thanksgiving are recently behind us, and now we’re all about Gingerbread houses and Christmas-themed sugar cookies, with visions of glazed ham and Old English Trifle just around the corner.
Our supermarket had a stock of large, knobbly photogenic Lemons, which inspired me to use a few in a new still life.
Why It’s Working: By incorporating a positive rewards system and tailored programs that help people take small steps toward success, DailyFeats boosts confidence for users and motivates them to achieve their dreams. Users can either cash in their points for swag or donate to the non-profit of their choice.
man ever spoke like this man.” (John 7:46)
SOLD activity is still the biggest piece of neighborhood real estate activity as of February 2012 and while there is just 1 home Under Contract, there’s also very FEW available neighborhood homes for sale right now.
A few plastic drinking cups
Since I've been on a chalkboard kick lately, I thought I would share my latest transformation with you.
Her mother took her to the kitchen. She filled three pots with water. In the first, she placed carrots, in the second she placed eggs and the last she placed ground coffee beans. She let them sit and boil without saying a word.
It’s quite beautiful.
These days it's no longer a prime news item but every day we are shown footage of the Costa Concordia in its unreal position off the island of Giglio, buffeted by grey waves. Initially, bobbing furniture was bottle-necked between floats and the gaudy carpet was thrown up vertical, but by now all those relics of the tacky mid-winter cruise are gone, and all that remains is an underwater labyrinth of dark holes and surging rank water. It is so awful to look at that tilted silenced world - the podium for the dancing girls, the mega-kitchens awaiting their ghostly chefs.
Ethnic hair will forever remain a mystery to anyone who does not have it, even some people with it. Unless you watch Good Hair, the hilarious documentary done by Chris Rock that explains a little bit here and there. For the most part though, it is just a mystery. However, there are a few guidelines you should follow when approaching someone with Ethnic hair. Should you feel the urge to touch, grab, pull, or massage your way through that person’s hair, stop and follow these simple rules.
Sowing my way gives you have three chances of success at each point you want a parsnip to grow. You can also identify the seedlings from weeds very quickly, as there's normally a cluster of two or three, and there's much less thinning out to do. Simples.
Applicant, who suffers from mild paralysis of the lower body, has been in prison since 1992. In 2003, he was transferred to a different facility where he was supposed to be put in a ward that could cope with his condition, but he was put in an “ordinary” unit. His transfer into the new unit meant that he could not access the toilets or use any physiotherapy facilities. His request to for a sentence deferral was rejected in 2005. While the prison opened a new ward that could have addressed his condition, due to overcrowding he was not moved there. After this point he was in and out of detention in a hospital facility due to the conditions in the prison. Based on these facts the Court found a violation of Article 3 prohibiting inhuman or degrading treatment.
But one thing I am sure of, being a Christian is not taking the easy road. It's not hiding behind the fact that one day we will spend eternity in Heaven with our Savior. So instead of doing the hard stuff we just hid in our comfortable little houses and pretend that what is going on doesn't pretain to us. After all it's not our children.
Still, it was a little rough on the old self-esteem.
Don’t hesitate, break out today!
When my flight was taking off from Male’ to Colombo I was thinking to myself… “Last night I was home, with my beloved, enjoying a home cooked meal and getting a good night’s sleep in my own bed but tonight I won’t be.” It is the most hopeless feeling in the world! Even if my flu was cured by some pills all I need for now is some chicken soup for the soul!
St. Joan of Arc, pray for us.
Moyo was testifying about his escape from the same court on August 10 2011.
Captions due Wednesday before midnight.
when we're living in the rig
Recollections-Button Brads &Die Cut, EKSuccess Punch,
With Tar Beach, we attempted some new forms of connecting with the book and theme. We did have a book discussion, but we opened the discussion with everyone jotting down on a Post-It what they believed “freedom” meant (see the PowerPoint for Tar Beach); they then posted it on a white board, and then they took turns reading everyone’s ideas. We then went into a discussion on Tar Beach (what it is, where examples of freedom are, what everyone thought of the art, etc.). At the end of the discussion, everyone was invited to create some art of their own, expressing the idea of freedom (what they love, what gives them freedom).
So, a thank you is in order. I'm offering Free Shipping for the whole month of May! Enter the coupon code "blessed" and receive free shipping on any and all orders from here.
The bow of apology is a big thing in Japan. It is an admittance of ‘I /We fucked up and I/we am/are sorry’ and yet I have seen it given for something's that was beyond that individuals control, we were once delayed on a train for 30 mins due a a landslide caused by a Tremor. When we arrived at our destination the entire staff were out front, ticket staff up to senior management all trying to help us get to our onward destinations and up front the Manager of the station doing the big bow, apologising to us for the inconvenience, not his fault, but he still felt he needed as an honourable person to apologise..
beautiful young girls
People interested in a modern, sustainable version of communal living may be interested in attending tomorrow's meeting about a new project planned by Brooklyn Cohousing.
I refresh’d myself with it only, I could relish it only,
I’ve been doing shows with them for about 6 months. I met them through my agent and had them on a few shows. It was a good fit. Fans seemed to like them. They’re younger so it’s nice to have the youth and the energy out here.
Regain the throne - Absurd Minds
I don’t
from Broadway to the Hudson and the traffic came and returned.
He insisted people examine themselves so they would really know if they were walking in the light or not. Sometimes what people think is light is really darkness.
Everywhere I want to keep you beside me
*** HOLE CARDS ***
I'm quite a staunch non-supporter of teenage drinking. It's taken Phil some serious chat time to get me this far and I'm only just starting to dip my toe into his way of thinking. I believe Carissa is sensible and wouldn't do anything silly but I'm also sure that the parents of the drunken teenagers in the city probably think the same. Obviously, I'm also concerned about her safety should someone take advantage of her if she's lost self-control. We're trying to assist her to realise her own feelings when she's intoxicated so she can develop her own limits with our supervision and support.
en aan jouw warme lippen stillen
the day you took me fishing? i went fishing with my dad one time on the river and it was more like practice. because he didn't really know much of what he was doing. he kept saying "you know about as much as i do"... so im not sure that counted. so this was probably my first time ever, the day you decided to take me.
It's missing the lid but I don't care. It has an adorable booklet tied with a little pink cord.
Yet another hour later, filling in all my other personal details, I clicked the button confirming my membership, realising, too late, that I had created someone called Rubarb.
My oldest graduates next year and my middle will be a junior.
I do, of course, have a couple of gripes. First, I do wish Brookfield had been a bit more explicit about pointing out that trying out just one of these critical lenses would be a perfectly good place to start. He does emphasise frequently that the process of critical reflection is slow and hard, and involves a lot of resistance from yourself and others as you start to discover things you’d really rather ignore. However, a bit more reassurance that you can start critical reflection with one tiny thing and build from there would not have gone amiss. (I am delighted that he pointed out that changing the requirements of a course halfway through, regardless of whether you think you are responding to student demand and needs, is unlikely to end well – I do sometimes get the sense that some writers forget that radically revising a course mid-stream often just isn’t practical, and major revisions of the syllabus might be best left to the next time you prepare to teach the course.)
The other was served on a chafing dish.
Here's a shot of the index entry for Capt. Slatter:
What do you think my dream means? I think Kiefer could learn a lesson from my dream: Kiefer, beware of men bearing otters.
OK, we're down to #4, the proverbial last but not least. A bit more restrained...whew! I have enough to trim up four pockets, and probably the shoulders too - as that appears to be the Langerfeld touch in recent years...
Have you decided which girls are most like you?
Know that I feel the same
It’s an interesting game that tells you a lot about personalities – who’s optimistic or pessimistic, choosing between focusing on marriages or on trick points, and whether the opponents can effectively ally to defeat a contract or only play for their own score. One little tidbit I remember is that if the contract winner realizes that things are hopeless, and guesses that his opponents might score high if the hand is played out, can concede the hand, taking the full penalty for losing his contract. Usually, whenever I was playing this, conceding was done by tossing your cards, including the ones that you’d just picked up in the blind, into the center of the table face down, and announcing – ‘forty each,’ because in the event of a concession, the opponents both count a fixed score of forty points.
But the racing did end, I have made my way back to Arizona.
Come out and see us for a delicious day of beer drinking. All beers will be served in 10oz pours (11.5oz snifters) so you should be able to have a few of them and still remember your name.
Welcome to Wigan Athletic, the team rooted to the bottom of the table for so long you would have thought the DW actually stood for Dead-Weight Stadium. Pre-game Gladiator soundtrack, convincing win, calm and collected manager, Fergie squirming. “Thank you for visiting the Don’t Worry…we’ll-be-alright-again-Stadium”, say Wigan, “we hope to see you next season.”
Easy Star All Stars, Toubab Krewe, VibeSquaD, Break Science, Gift of Gab, ZOOGMA, Starkey
- Do be a “yes” person. In my opinion, management here has to deal with some downer personalities compared to the typical American employee. I think they appreciate the can-do American attitude.
The fact remains that the burden of proof is on the one who claims that a document addresses a certain topic when, in fact, the document makes no mention of the topic. That Mr. Palm refuses to recognize this shows his desperation. As I said in my previous rebuttal, one could just as easily claim that Leo XIII and Pius XII did not mention cosmology because they were directed by the Holy Spirit not to do so, in addition to the fact that neither Leo XIII or Pius XII wanted to call into question the decisions of the 1616 and 1633 Church without doing a formal and official study of the matter.
Alarm goes off at 6:15 a.m.
10/22 San Francisco, CA @ The Hemlock Tavern
2. Mix it with salt, turmeric powder, chilli powder & roasted gram powder (putani).
The Hogan XT s a great tent for cycle touring. Although not super light, it’s light enough for one and offers a suitably large vestibule to stow your bike and kit. Although stowing the bike in the vestibule offers little real security advantage, it keeps your steed hidden from prying eyes and out of the worst weather. The shock-corded poles can be a pain and the seams do need sealing, but I’ve spent many a happy night out in this.
For example, if you want a culture of integrity do not continue to employ people who clearly lack it just because, “they get results.” Doing so, only reinforces a culture of getting short term results by any means necessary.
If you share the Athanasakis family’s values of providing quality products and superior customer service, and possess a commitment to making your business work, you may just have what it takes to become accepted as a Manny & Olga’s™ franchisee! If so, “welcome to the family!”www.mannyandolgas.com
During her time of doing this, she managed to smuggle out and save 2500 kids/infants.
Cardstock Really Reasonable Ribbons
After letting Wally out to go to the bathroom and watching him go, she said, Mommy, why does Wally's bottom look like that? I'm glad I don't have a dog bottom.
One Note Samba 02:21
Teresa was next and showed how her mom had French braided her hair. Brandon was the final one. Brandon was a forgetful yet imaginative boy who often came to school with his hair pointed in wild directions, looking as if he had just rolled out of bed. He usually forgot to bring anything for show and tell, so Amy asked, "Honey, did you remember to bring something today?"
So, when I was going through what I went previous to these past 18 months, eating food was a HUGE struggle. It got to the point where I weighed 80 pounds standing at 4'10 1/". Yes, this was alarming to others around me and especially to myself. I was all bones...disgustingly skeletal...very scary to even look at without a doubt.
Those, at least, are three ideas to be going on with, but the book is open for all manner of suggestions and ideas - such as these. If we can work it thus, it would be useful to have a "long list" to take with us to Harrogate so that, by the time the blood (or coffee) has been mopped from the floor, we shall have our new Charter.
At least five times a day I get these awesome little boy arms thrown around me and McQ will squeeze me and say, "You are the best mom in the entire world!"
chalkboards
Smart, refined, handsome, edgy enough to be interesting, all said, my date was perfect. I decided on Coquille St Jacques, and sipped on my wine, enjoying every moment and taste.
The first sighting of Crazies following Daddy with their lawnmowers.
When I asked my father how he felt about seeing those severed heads he just said "What can I say? That's war."
To me, just about everything in my life boils down to faith and values. With a view that God is the creator of life, I was hard pressed to escape the implications that come with 187 tons of dead and dying fish. Second to God, there was righteous and fully justified public outrage, not to mention the wrath of the Federal Clean Water Act.
Runner-up Questions:
Ink: Real Red(#103133), Pretty in Pink(#101301)
Nothing has been the same for Will ever since what happened last summer. One day, on an ordinary sailing trip with his brother, there is a strange accident. When Will wakes up, he learns his brother has disappeared, presumed drowned. Worst of all, Will can't remember what happened—his family finds him unconscious, with no memory of the accident.
"They're going to be champions, like their parents," Will piped in. He seemed to be trying to dispel the tension. "If I'd known you two were going to act like teenagers, I'd've sent a warning, though."
There were ten judges at the trial of Galileo. They were all Cardinals. One was the Pope’s brother and another his nephew. The trial was conducted by the Inquisition. Galileo did not have a copy of the charges against him or the evidence; the rules were not that of a court, but formalised in 1588 to judge ‘against heretical depravity throughout the whole Christian Commonwealth’.
And someone reading something blue,
After much kerfuffle and a slightly twisted anklee I was, ahem, almost done. When I heard something behind me. Get closer. And growl. And then there was light.
“Why don’t you want to read it?” Mom kept asking. She seemed hurt about it.
Okay, here is a new set of photographs around the city. The weather has been beautifully diverse. Not sure why people would complain when we get a little rain, this is northern California and we don't quite get the drastic season changes to shovel snow or deal with unbearable humidity. I'm a fog worshiper that is no secret, but I also have enjoyed the recent random warmer days. We got to see some monumental thunder lighting show a few weeks ago and here is a photo from the local news: msnbc link
Hello and welcome to another Stamp Something challenge!
Vampire/Cannibal Hunter
And opened the top.
So now I have to tag seven authors to take part in this. Red rover, red rover let Tess Dickenson, L'Aussie Denise, Laura Eno, Graeme Reynolds, Shannon Esposito, G.P. Ching, and Steven Chapman come over.
Disney spent $250 million on their project and had hoped to gross $700 million. That may sound like a lot, but it’s all in a day’s work. Literally. The U.S. spends about $300 million in Iraq and Afghanistan daily. Disney’s dreamed-off profit wouldn’t finance our military project through Wednesday. That catastrophic loss Disney is facing? We lose almost that much every day by lunch.
And what of Mr. Canecchia? Looks as though he knows hypocrisy when he sees it, too. Here’s the latest on his fight, in light of the announcement about Four Peaks Devils’ Hypocrisy Ale. Looks like news of the launch party has already reached San Tan Brewing.
And so, today, I'm climbing back out.
On the third day I stumbled upon it, the grave I mean. It´s a sad story; simple wooden cross, once painted in cheap colour, now withered and worn down by the endless wind that roams these lands. Some sort of inscription I believe, but of course it can´t be deciphered now; fairy letters on milky mist.
Despite groan-inducing prices for food and necessities by captive visitors at these snowy mountain retreats, it’s hard to ignore the siren pull of shimmering snowfall over snow-swept, jagged mountains, snow-slathered forests and fields.
We enjoyed a birthday dinner of lasagna, garlic bread and Ceasar salad.
The blue flame doesn’t pass through walls or roof tiles. It doesn’t have to be a specific event and neither does the brazier.
And I still have ongoing giveaways~
Theakston: There’s a clue in the title.
When I told my husband this, he called me out. "That was rude!" he chastised me. My husband talks to everyone...me, not so much. At all.
Sincerely
“That’s not possible.”
As the unofficial start to Colorado’s cycling season, the Subaru Elephant Rock Cycling Festival is celebrating year 25 this spring. It consists of five distances varying from seven miles to 100, giving it a choose-your-own-adventure feel.
If you continue to call (or email), you’re making a fool out of yourself. Stop it and move on. Now.
applications, documentation, site plans, maps, and estimates are included the enclosed
Summary of the lecture:
Dies - Spellbinder, Magnolia Doohickey Fence
Initially, I tried to battle The Funk with a deluge of chick flicks and a couple extra glasses of Smoking Loon. But the man is the master of crushing flimsy, ill-conceived defenses and before you know it, I was neck-deep in a swamp of excessive sleeping, banana-pepper pizza slices, premium ice cream with homemade chocolate syrup, and perfectly stale cheesy puffs. And that was just the first week.
I think first Oscar was for set designs and was won by Alice In Wonderland? I kind of tuned out because I was bored out of my mind by Tom Hanks. Sorry, hopefully he won't show up again.
'OK so that's 2.50 each couple?'
It just may not be enough. Or more specifically, it just may be that his issues dovetail so thoroughly with issues with my dad. It may be that I’m especially needy in this area – one that he’s especially weak in. And vice versa.
1 third
~For a few years I did the 'year in review' meme in which I posted the first sentence of of each month's first post, but I haven't blogged every month in 2010, so that meme won't be happening here. I've been thinking all day about this past year; in many ways it's been fairly uneventful. If 2009 was the year of change for me, 2010 is the year I had to live into that change.
10. Don't Give Up 8:30
I will never get the love I am seeking from human beings. I may never be recognized for who I am I this life. My talents might go unappreciated. I might have to toil and spend a lot of time doing things I don’t really want to do. If this life is all there is, that would be tragic. But if all that is fulfilled in the next life, in my resurrection, which Jesus made possible – then what I face here and now is bearable. It isn’t the final word. I’m not getting too old – I’m actually getting closer to the fulfillment of all I want as I age.
This is just one idea to save money on your heating costs.
I was inspired by this Birthday Blessings card by Queen Holly (Toy) I used different images - making mine a new baby card but I used her great design.
as for the first time since I met you,
So many caption possibilities here I can't pick one.
Thank you for all your beautiful entries in our Monochromatic challenge last week! The DT really loved looking at all the wonderful ways your showed off your style using a monochrome color palette.
This single, their third of four, shows the capital-R rock n' roll sound in full-force, with two stomping R&B/Blues-lovin originals sure to appeal to a generation or three of rockers.
Here I am in this boring psychology class in a huge 300 seat lecture hall. Everyone is kind of doing their own thing, most are on their laptops or phones like me, others are doing work for other classes, some have stepped out early and of course the very few who are actually paying attention. This is the norm of an every day college class. Simple but consistent. But today someone decides to be the class clown. The professor is somewhat out there and makes statements that are kind of bold and quite frankly keeps the class somewhat interesting. This one kid decides to make that his platform to get his 3o seconds of fame. The first remark (did not care enough to actually listen to what the statement was) got a few laughs. The second, a little less. The third and fourth now is where the line needs to be drawn. Do you not notice the dwindling laughs and the growing quiet spreading through the room? People like this are not funny and are more disruptive than anything else. Stuff like this always bothers me because one would think common sense would inform them to cease their actions. Common sense it seems is becoming a scarce resource.
Sundays 11-1 pm
~Laura
Anyway. What are your thoughts? Now that I have left, is reading and commenting on SA news verboten? Should we prevent people from commenting on, say, USA news if they aren’t resident? Should I not share with the world, in this age of social media, the things that I find here which I find strange and wondrous? (You know, like getting your phone line connected in less than two hours, electricity connected in a two minute visit to the power company, having no fence or burglar bars around my house, and, yes, having to do my own dishes and mow the lawn.)
Hair - Matthew Curtis / TRESemme
Together we laugh;
Fairness has nothing to do with it. Maintaining a good relationship with the people who sell a a lot of your product does.
He looked at me like WTF…I heard a door open from behind me, and an old man came out from a house. He had of course rang for the taxi. Feeling a bit awkward, I jogged on.
He has absolutely no privacy. Every four hours he gets a new guard. He is dealing the most challenging circumstances imaginable and yet during this he writes what became known as the “Epistle of Joy.” In this particular passage he is exhorting the saints at Macedonia to resist strife and learn to live in peace with each other and to trust God to provide and meet their needs.
Faker, I thought.
I’m not a fan of chains, or memes. But I do like that part of what this has been doing is getting people to share blogs that they enjoy reading. It opens up the blogosphere 7 fold, and that’s pretty exciting, if you ask me.
When Adele spots her good friends Donna and Josie spending time together and being all chummy without her, she’s devastated. After seeing the two women heading into one of their houses together, she’s determined to find out exactly what’s going on. Peering through the front window of the house reveals more than Adele was betting on, and what’s more, she likes it…
The only sign of the Wilder responsible for the Gate was the glimpse of a forearm and wrist, too long and slender to be human, reaching towards where Van Raighan's legs would be. They weren't making any of the obvious mistakes, leaving landmarks Pevan could use to locate the other end of the Gateway.
Yesterday I found my question answered for me in the form of a sermon or a talk. I think that the fact that some of my questions are being answered almost simultaneously after asking them is something that I need to pay attention to.
I have this urge to go to New Mexico, on a sporadic time frame. The impulse will be so strong, that I can hardly bear it. It is a near panic, at times. Because finances aren’t everflowing, I can’t jump on a plane when this impulse begins.
About the Author: Patrick (Pat) MacAdam is a native Cape Bretoner who has made Ottawa his home since 1959. He holds bachelor’s degrees in arts and education from St. Francis Xavier University. He paid his way through university by writing for the Sydney Post-Record, Halifax Chronicle-Herald and Fredericton Daily Gleaner. He spent three summers in the Canadian Officers Training Corps in Camp Borden, Ontario, and Halifax, Nova Scotia, and was commissioned a lieutenant in the Royal Canadian Army Service Corps. His entire professional life has been in public relations and politics. He was a researcher, speechwriter, and aide to Prime Minister John Diefenbaker from 1959 to 1963. In 1983, he joined his university friend, Brian Mulroney, as his first employee and most senior aide.
Yes I'm now enduring a double punishment - I'm both in the Dog House "big time" according to my wife and I can't get the image of Steve, John and Luke pirouetting in their white unitards out of my mind. Oh the horror, the horror.
Hello, Good Evening and Welcome,
Thibault Janin, director of marketing at Eole Water, said: ‘This technology could enable rural areas to become self-sufficient in terms of water supply.
Michelle was up first and went down for a pre-child awakening stroll. She discovered that the beach was full to the rim with small perfectly formed pebbles. One of them had a natural hole caused by a seam of silicate chipping away and revealing a small passageway to the other side. Ironically, this was her last beach and final day of proper travelling. She was elated and told our sleepy and seemingly disinterested heads the news. We mumbled our congratulations and blearily studied her new found anomaly. She announced that her mission was accomplished and hobbled off to find the showers.
(and Brooklynn is partially clothed beside me)
Nothing will make you want to chug Hurricane's and high step like Big Sam!
“Okay. I’ll get changed and let you know what we’re having. You need anything?”
Considering medical need will also influence what device you get approved for – you might want a scooter but if you’re only going to be using it outdoors as substitute transportation, ADP coverage will likely be declined. Your vendor and the Authorizer will help you navigate what device and options are best to help your long term needs.
You can help many people by forwarding this blog url. Because we are in a time of major transformation predicted by many different ancient cultures, it is easier than ever to transform negative beliefs and energy patterns.
Exaggerate each feature until man is metamorphosed into beast, vermin, insect
Thankfully all that will change on Monday because my favorite bootcamp is starting! I've worked with Clary, the guy that runs it, for years and he is amazing. I really like it because if I miss he gives me a really hard time. It's amazing how much easier it is to stick to something when you know you're going to get in crap if you don't!
BAR FOCUS: Cyrus, Healdsburg, CA; FIG, Charleston, SC.
Safety and Security Ministry spokesperson Andre Martin said yesterday that the moratorium on the publication of crime statistics would be reconsidered as soon as the standards of such statistics had been enhanced to "acceptable levels".
The film was unveiled at a recent celebration of the Emerson branch. Now copies of it are being passed around town to black and white families, and schools are planning to use the documentary as part of the curriculum to teach about race relations.
And yes, tension force and spring force could easily be the same thing. It just depends on how you want to view things.
The initial description of what happened Friday night is that Isabel’s parents put her down to bed around 11:00 PM and the father discovered her missing around 8:00 AM in the morning.
Casa Molana in Broad Street served fusion food and confusing drinks. I decided to play it safe. A green Margarita, heavy on the tequila with plenty of crushed ice - no salt. As soon as Jodie’s old-fashioned Martini arrived I so wished I’d ordered one instead. Classic, classy – everything Jodie wasn’t. The cocktail should have been mine. Sucking through a squat black
Key Players: Darius Johnson-Odom (18.3 ppg), Jae Crowder (17.6 ppg, 7.9 rpg), Davante Gardner (9.7 ppg, 5.5 rpg), Vander Blue (8.7 ppg)
THE KING'S MEN TOUR
The fattening dots burst into nimble-
Or maybe it’s the Stockholm syndrome whereby victims fall in love with their captors. It happens. No need to beat yourself up over it.
I began the break by attending one day of Gilded's Art Event~ The Art of Spring! I loved the bracelet that we created! I met some wonderful ladies at my table!! It was sad to have missed the entire weekend but the day I was there~ was nice!
I know I do not know what Maggie's future holds, or any of my girls, but my faith has become stronger than I knew possible. What I do know is I am loving all my girls at this moment and taking it all in because it goes by way to fast. And I feel so blessed to have these three little wonderful souls call me 'momma'.
Sources: PETER KEEPNEWS, New York Times, youtube, imdb.com, nmdb.com
The guests this time were Chris Collison and Geoff Parnell who have a new book out entitled “No more consultants – we know more than we think“. The theme was based on ‘Who wants to be a millionaire’, which David admitted to studying intensely the day before to get his Chris Tarrant impression right. No comment on his impression but his questions cleverly led us through the most important topics of the book until we reached the half million dollar question.
Fuck the closer Video, I need to code more.
i still can't remember how
Of Visitors – the fairest –
Yet again it makes me realise how much Guiding has given to me and how lucky I am to have met so many people while travelling along the great Guiding highway!
We just never saw any evidence of it.
I am not even close to being perfect, no one is, but thankfully I have a God who forgives and loves me despite my sinful ways. If you have questions about salvation please don't hesitate to ask. I may not know the answers, but I will find someone who does and get back to you. Don't put this off.
A little power.
It's been said here a lot, but I don't think it can be said enough that The Monkees are the most underrated band of all time. Unfortunately, the tug o'war between pop stardom and counterculture cred was a losing battle from day one.
My projects start in one of two ways: I find an object and want to transform it, but have no idea how. Or, I have an idea and no idea how to manifest it in a sculpture. Either way, it's pretty nebulous. In this case I started with an object. Here it is:So, I had this camera and wanted to use it but I had no clue what I wanted to do with it. I began by getting a good look at it--figuring out what opened, what could be removed, what moved, etc.
These are words and phrases I cannot stand. We are going to be doing some renovations on our 'big room'. This room is called the big room because that is all it is, a big, effin' room. It is about 40x14 feet. When we bought the house we knew that it was used as a rec room. We were not going to use it for that purpose however because there was another larger room that was perfect for a large tv and a comfy couch. Now, keep in mind this is a 1950's Cape Cod style home. Large rooms a a little odd and are usually additions on a house. The reason the prior and first owners of the house did this was because they had 7 kids...in 3 bedrooms.
9. Yesterday, I babysat my almost-2-year-old niece because she’d had an earache and a temperature the day before. I was really not looking forward to the day, and it did feel super long, but we made it through, thanks to homemade Play-Doh, crayons, cartoons, books, lunch, and about a million false alarm trips to the bathroom (we’re potty training). Little A. even took a good long nap until her mama came home. Mission accomplished! :D
Everybody discussed the Hemingway story and I wanted them to stop, because it means something to me.
First vacation stay at Miami Beach.
1# flaked oats
John F. Watt has been a mystery that has me mystified since the 1980s. He was a prolific writer, but almost nothing appeared under his own name and trying to trace the network of pen-names he used is proving to be a nightmare. I've traced 46 pen-names so far and it seems very likely that he used double that number.
When you have to book in advance and work with ambient light you're at the mercy of the elements. Fortunately Spain is a lovely sunny country so chances are the light will be good, but it's always worth thinking about the best time of year to photograph a particular tourist attraction.
Our establishment are doing this to us only half consciously, they are doing it because they are the product of a radical ideology designed for an entirely different purpose. They and the generation before them were created and indoctrinated by people who hoped to see the West overthrown by a Communist East. Although that purpose no longer exists the mindset has long been fixed, Western Culture must be destroyed, and if the Soviet Union is no longer there to do it, Islam and mixed marriage will work well enough. So, although the aims have changed, they carry the project forward, and indoctrinate new generations because they have been programmed to do so.
I brushed a nice coat of stain onto the desktop and then wiped off the excess within 15 minutes per the manufacturer's instructions. The right side shows it with the first coat of excess wiped off. I did two coats of stain before moving onto the poly. I always use Minwax's Water-Based Polycrylic because the VOC levels are lower than your traditional poly product. You can actually see what the can looks like in the upper right corner of the picture.
140g/5oz plain or dark chocolate
The proverbial examples have to do with war, such as the need to destroy Carthage (i.e., Carthago delenda est). Natura est amanda, for instance, means ‘nature should be loved’ which implies an active subject in the relationship even if it the continuation of the thought could focus on the ways that nature ‘should be loved’ (i.e., as opposed to ways of ‘loving’). In reality, our language is designed to focus on a supposed ‘passivity’ or ‘activity’ for the sake of description, whereas every action can be described from a myriad of points of view.
His eyes scanned her voluptuous body. “Stunning”. ” She did not deserve to die or may be she did” … He grinned.
So, anyone who's thinking that "in these tough economic times" it's perfectly okay to take those designs that you see in magazines and on the Internet and copy them and sell them as your own should take note: if you get caught (and you will get caught), not only will you be publicly embarrassed and humiliated, but you will get kicked out of BeadLand for good.
Kim Jong Moon, 56, a businessman in South Korea shared the same sentiment. “I know we were only supposed to observe Earth Hour by turning off non-essential lights and also unplug unnecessary electrical items, but my friends and I decided to go a little further by cutting our water and gas usage for the entire hour, you know, to make a bigger impact for our beloved planet.
May 8, 2012 10:22 PM – You always want to learn the hard way. Add me, or learn the heard way. You won’t be able to take care of your daughter without a job. They will take her from you.
He had fled Pakistan, renounced Islam, and settled in Canada. Then the authorities decided he didn’t fit the refugee “profile” and were going to deport him. As a declared apostate, he faced death if he were to be returned to his native country.
21. “No Widows” by The Antlers
Anyhoo, the main point leveled against me (by @GreatHeckBrew), as far as I can figure it, is that "carbon reduction policies of European governments are well intentioned but counterproductive. They increase global emissions"ie. it's suggested that EU policies transfer emissions to the developing world, resulting in a net increase in Carbon emissions. The mechanism proposed seems to be that the burden of EU policies on EU based business impairs competitiveness, so dirty (less regulated) developing world industries gain an advantage and expand.
Thank you compels me to keep looking for and finding those 3 or more things daily......
If this event were to occur, you could count on a very prolonged period of great civil unrest, riots, theft and wide spread violence. Repairs will be very slow and new parts for the large generators and power plants will likely have to be manufactured overseas and delivered to the United States. Furthermore, these foreign factories would have to retool their machines to create the specific part that we need if they are not already our supplier. And that is if the other industrialized nations aren't effected, as well.
I turned around and headed back towards the compound, and slowed when I approached the entrance, but this time there was a car pulling out of the compound as I got there. Once again, I continued on past the entrance and went on a mile or two until I could turn around.
Elvis Costello – Declan MacManus
The Sentimentalists by Johanna Skibsrud (D&M Publishers)
Most of my closest friends in high school were my classmates since the first grade! It really pays off to have studied in one school for 10 years. I got to keep a solid set of sisters and nothing much has changed over the years, well, except for our different career paths. But other than that, we're basically the same old crazy-ass girls who kicked and fought our way through elementary and high school life together. :)
To celebrate the release of my second novel, Handle with Care, I’m on a two week blog tour. A grand prize will be awarded to a randomly chosen commenter during the tour: an exclusive Handle with Care mug (which I’m happy to post worldwide), and a $25 voucher to spend at All Romance eBooks (or alternative ebook retailer of your choice). I’ll make the prize draw on Wednesday 9th May at 9am (GMT), and will announce the winner on my blog. Visit the tour itinerary for a list of all the stops, and comment on each to increase your chances of winning!
in search
Storage: Consume within 3 days. For longer term storage (up to 7 days), seal with a layer of clarified butter, duck fat or goose fat.
We moved our stuff out of our apartment 12/29/10. We lived in our brother-in-law's apartment until 1-8-10. We lived in our new Kentucky home until 1-10-10. And now I'm living back at my parents until 1-19-10.
Who is the last one to appear you ask?? Grace and Connors MOM! Yes.. she is a vampire. Lorcan recognizes her and smiles. What is going on here??
So, if you find yourself in a pinch radio-wise and you happen to be in the Guaymas area, we suggest visiting SERVICIOS MARINOS - Comunicacion y Navegacion Electronica. It is located about a mile south of Marina Singlar (Fonatur) on the same road - left hand side.
You can find other sellers having a sale by visiting the linky party below.
When the day is done, do you lie in your bed with the next hundred chores running through your head? Ever told your child, ‘We’ll do it tomorrow.’ And in your haste, not see his sorrow? Ever lost touch? Let a good friendship die? Just call to say ‘Hi’?
I'm going to my parents' house this weekend, so it's very likely I'll have some stories next week. I hope everyone has a great Mother's Day weekend! I'll leave you with some pictures from the wedding:
About Margaret: Margaret lives with her husband and two daughters in a Chicago suburb. Her book, A Mother’s Heart Knows was published by Thomas Nelson in 2005. Go Back and Be Happy, a co-authored book will be published by Lion Hudson in July 2008. Margaret has been featured on Greg Wheatly’s “Prime Time America,” TLN’s “Aspiring Women,” and LeSea’s “The Harvest Show.” Margaret writes freelance articles for The Daily Herald, the largest suburban Chicago newspaper. Notable interviews include Wolfgang Puck, Thomas Kinkade, Susan Branch and Dr. John Gottman. Margaret also wrote a feature article for crosswalk.com. With a master’s degree in international business, Margaret became a vice president in the corporate finance division of a New York City bank and worked there from 1986-1993. Supporting charitable causes is important to Margaret. For the past five years, she has served on the board of directors for WINGS, an organization that helps abused women and their children get a new start in life.
*inhale*....but then the "glass half empty" side of me barges in and flashes the reality of hanging clothes outside in the Florida heat with squirrels running along the line leaving little dirty feet tracks as it goes and the feral cats thinking that the hanging linens would be ideal for scratching on and my whitest of white sheet catching on Maribel as she runs through only to fall and be drug through the grass where the fire ants can hitch a ride and wreak havoc with their wicked biting and then a flash rain hits drenching everything in the 5 minutes it's there rendering the clothes unclean and needing to be rewashed. *exhale*
Who is that Prophet? It is the Messiah, Jesus Christ.
Cue next wave of shock at the overwhelming effectiveness of my denial. Whining "But I didn't even know" is not proving very helpful.
“Hell is the right word for it.” The sergeant extended a hand and guided Hank as Chris trailed them to the secure area near the unmarked car.
2And I saw, and behold a white horse: and he that sat on him had a bow; and a crown was given unto him: and he went forth conquering, and to conquer.
Request No. 3
The music was nice I guess, the art was average, and I didn't notice the quality of animation because I never pay any attention to it so I'll just assume that it was fine.
These two 45s are probably the pick of the bunch:
They are called Feral Warriors—an elite band of immortals who can change shape at will. Sworn to rid the world of evil, consumed by sorcery and seduction, their wild natures are primed for release . . .
Are you even bothered?
By Rob Hamlin
11. Broccoli
Dreams – Bloodsport
Yesterday, I came across a post by one of my bloggy friends that has me a bit worried. In it, she shared her concerns about social media sites (blogs, Facebook, Pinterest, etc.) and how frequently people use the works of others without the owner's permission. It has to do with the whole copyright infringement issue. Are you, in fact, stealing what rightfully and legally belongs to someone else? Oh, brother...I have to admit that I've never given any real thought to it. Pinterest, which I LOVE, is a prime example. I get on there regularly and when I see something I like, I pin it. I mean, isn't that the point, afterall? I don't sit there and think, "Hold on a second. That picture does not belong to me, it belongs to someone else. Do I have the legal right to snag it and do with it what I will?" Click here to read some heavy duty information about this subject.
Scripture tells us that in our last days the love of most will grow cold and that men will become lovers of self. What better way to love self than to claim for self the attribute of "compassion" while doing nothing to exercise compassion save being for compassion through political means?
“They were both armed with guns, wearing gloves and balaclavas and were approaching soldiers who believed that their lives were in immediate danger.”
My Uber-Saison, which I call "Beaucoup Belgian Farmhouse Ale." - Yum...Tasty!
so, let’s close out the old chapter 19 and get on with the new…
we were VERY self sustainable. Country Folk can Survive, I guess!
I listened for a few minutes (good excuse to stay cuddled up in my blankets, yes?), and the conversation continued to explain that up until this point – and I’m guessing beyond, if you’d let it – your life just continues to get better.
At our dinner table, my lovely wife and I like to hear what our children did that day at school.
DC La Rue - Overture (BC Edit)
It was at that point I began to feel sorry for them as they were about to travel with darkening skies in the direction of the airport, which clouded over swiftly with the accompanying sound of thunder in the air and flashes of lightening illuminating the dark skies.
* Marc Brown
The services show up. The network takes over.
I applaud the move to a paperless world (except where novels are concerned and much as I love my e-reader, there’s nothing quite like holding a book in my hands) but …
You can have a total of four entries.
Much more important, though, will be internships. She must intern in the publishing industry before she graduates (for example, during the summer months). Internships are probably, in fact, the single most important thing one could do to lay the groundwork for a job, since they provide practical (and resume) experience, allow her to see if she really likes the profession, provide knowledge about the industry, and perhaps most importantly, give one personal connections. These contacts (and the resume experience) will be all-important when it comes time for the job search. If two candidates compete for a job, and one has publishing internship experience and the other does not, it is nearly certain that the former will land the position. But she mustn’t assume that, because she has a dozen contacts, she will be assured a job upon graduation; publishing is all about timing, and if there are no openings when she graduates, her contacts may be useless. Thus she mustn’t become complacent. If she can’t find any internships with a literary agency, then she should be open to finding one in a publishing house. And it should be in New York if at all possible.
41. Sung karaoke- ARE YOU CRAZY!?
4) Let people in more.
Then there are also classic essay sort of bloggers - say, me? - who, while we write about our lives as parents, are happy to accept certain opportunities like phone calls with Gloria Steinem and sitcom set visits because they are experiential. They fit into our lives, they provide content for our blogs, and they give us the ability to make jokes about celebrity urine that then the Wall Street Journal can go and attribute to someone else.
I think I'm going to move to Austin.
She rides in my canoe,
Just as cross country riders are a different breed, the bikes they ride are as well. The cross country bike is completely different in many ways from other types of mountain riding bikes. The premise for cross country riders is speed. Everything about their bikes revolve with the idea of making the bikes faster and faster.
Priest also shows a softer side at points, but not for very long. Cleaner guitar tones introduce "(Take These) Chains" and "Fever", but it's not long before the chords erupt. Both highly underrated songs, but then, so is everything on this album that isn't named "You've Got Another Thing Comin'". The only tune I'm not a huge fanatic for is "Pain and Pleasure", which implements more or less a swaggering bluesy groove riff in the Zeppelin vein, yet even here the chorus is admittedly pretty good. In total, there is no imbalance to Screaming for Vengeance as there was with its predecessors. I never felt that I was experiencing a glut of creativity or phoned in filler; all the songs are very unified due to the production and pacing, but distinct from one another.
I really love my blog. Anyone who blogs regularly, knows that blogging actually requires a good deal of work, yet despite how busy I usually am, it doesn't feel like a chore. My blog allows me to indulge, or dare I even say wallow, in all the little things I'm enthusiastic about. It's like having my own magazine with total editorial control. Most of all, however, I love the fact that my blog has brought me into contact with some amazing people from across the globe. Yes, I'm talking about YOU! I have made some lovely friendships over the last seven months, and by visiting your fabulous blogs, I have not only been entertained, but also often learned many new and interesting things.
The direction this section took sliced through the older streets at a very acute angle. You can see this particularly if you walk along the northern side of the street and notice how the buildings terminate in very sharp points. The Movistar office is a good example, but there are several others that would serve just as well. It seems no thought was given to a remodelling of neighbouring blocks and they were left just as they were.
In the meantime, I have: to finish decorating (entering hour 15 on The Tree. Yes, just the TREE. It’s the illness, y’all.); shoot off some Christmas cards; schedule the handyman, piano movers, and the carpet people; clean up after said people; clean up after my OWN people; buy everything for Christmas; and, oh yeah, WORK. So, tis the season, and all that jazz.
While serving as a largely as a tourist attraction, the chateau is also used to produce wine. And…you guessed it! We totally got to experience a wine tasting while we were there. Around 11 in the morning. (Cue the “it’s 5:00 somewhere” logic)
The Japanese ‘hinomaru’- or the rising sun, is based on the belief by most Japanese that the sun is red in colour. The sun is the basis of all primal energy and is the beginning of the cosmos. Even the national flag is of the hinomaru on a white background. Combinations of red and white signify auspiciousness in the Japanese traditions and white and red strips of cloth are hung during the wedding ceremonies there.
Anyways, I guess I am just saying I need to get a little more balance in my life as far as exercise goes. After all what is 1/2 an hour to an hour a day anyways. It always starts my day off great!
Say "bespoke" and I think "expensive" and "elite". But there's a rather sensible element to this. The bespoke services I mentioned are by appointment only. That didn't sound very welcoming at first, but later I realised it made good sense – you don't go in unless you actually want or need something. It was a world far away from mindless shopping and impulse purchases.
In April 2007 the Natal Witness newspaper's switchboard was flooded with calls from drivers who said they were pushed off the N3 by a blue-light convoy, later identified as being that of now ANC president Jacob Zuma. The paper also reported at the time that a rifle had been aimed Pietermaritzburg man Faizel Mooideen and his family by security officers who had tried to push them off a lane on the highway.
And let us face it. Not everything you write should be published. Not everything is worth reading. So if a manuscript is not going anywhere, or it does not feel right, file it away or junk it. You may find a few out there who will read it, but you have to learn to be honest with yourselves as well. And that honestly is, I admit, very hard, very unrelenting, and very difficult on the ego.
The book The Emergence of the Relationship Economy looks at a wide range of factors in the adoption of social media, including culture. In bringing together a number of studies, chapter nine deals specifically with the issue of culture.
Following the Gatemaker's instructions, Rel wedged himself into the oval aperture of the Gateway, his back to the bottom of the opening and tingling with the contact, his foot against the top. That left his head and body upright on the far side, facing the Abyss. Though he twisted as best he could, all he could see of what the door had hidden was darkness. His free leg trailed across the concrete of the ledge, sliding slowly with the swing of the door.
O’Farrell
Although in most ways, the fall of the Soviet Union bore no resemblance to a natural disaster, the chaos and lawlessness that ensued selected its victims as arbitrarily as any tornado, flood, or earthquake. In my case, the USSR’s final days will always intertwine with the memory of being assaulted and held captive for the ten longest, darkest hours of my life. There was a moment that night when my mind fell quiet, and I considered my predicament: trapped in some murky room, outnumbered three to one, making a careful count of knives in sheaths, I wondered, will I live? And I calculated, with astonishing clarity, how to ensure that I would.
Fear of Fiction (I’m loving Oriel and her blog so much. The most recent example of her powers of awesomeness is a post about being stalked by plastic carrier bag that made me spurt tea out of my nose. Oriel completely rules!)
Chris (Mrs) married Chris (Mr) five years ago in November. They were very happy, 2 black labs, good jobs, nice house in the burbs. They struggled to have a baby and finally got accepted onto the IVF programme, after multiple tries and disappointments they had a bouncy wee baby boy. Just after he was born Chris (Mr) was transfered, with his painting job, to Auckland from Christchurch. Away the family embarked on a new adventure.
He, Johnny Evans, was a soldier under sentence,
When I shared this photo and story on Facebook, another friend described her Purple Day experience which had been inexplicable to her until she read my post:
Halloween is my absolute favorite time of year! It’s so much fun that I had to stretch it out into a two-week long celebration of all things creepy and frightening. Every day for 13 days leading up to Halloween, there is something scary good to do. In The Watershed Chronicle’s 13 Days of Halloween, there is a little something to entice even the most hardcore horror fan.
Wander around the Interwebs looking for ideas - try not to be distracted by the shiny!
Mostly...
Since I have things to do other than to sit motionless for longs periods time peering out a partially opened window like some dedicated sniper, I had to come up with a better method if I was to be successful. One thing that I learned during my bumbling efforts is that while the birds were very easily scared by any movement near the opened window, they didn’t seem bothered at all by the machine gun clicking of the camera being fired on its continuous setting.
7And to the angel of the church in Philadelphia write; These things saith he that is holy, he that is true, he that hath the key of David, he that openeth, and no man shutteth; and shutteth, and no man openeth;
The nest box door -
The death of Rabbi Yehudah HaNasi – as it appears in Talmud Bavli, Ketubot 104a and in Talmud Yerushalmi, Kilayim 9:3
Disney Prep & Landing: Naughty vs. Nice ... ABC Family ... 7:30 PM
So it seems that Jesse Jackson would prefer that these kids just stay in these schools, increase the odds of them dropping out and have a much harder time leading lives that will bring more financially security to them. He plans on filing a lawsuit to stop the closing of these schools.
postscript: 29 May 2008
The Versatile Blogger Award's rules are - you must say 7 things about yourself and pass the award on to some of your favorite blogs and let them know.
Everyone is different; everyone has something different to offer. By reading different authors and genres, you will get a feel for the kind of writing that is established and successful, so by reflect on differing styles of writing helps us to nurture our own style of writing.
In the morning the ship docked at Falmouth, which is an old city (founded in 1769), but a new cruise port that just opened last year. It's so new that my travel agent hasn't been there yet! The town is in between Montego Bay (30 minutes to the west) and Ocho Rios (an hour to the east).
In the UK, they would do the maths about what the EU costs and where it’s going – and pull out. There is nothing the EU could do to stop this at the moment. The RR planners would also be busy reconfiguring the UK economy, and building for a future of marketing added value to emerging Asia.
A few cases in point.
John Geraets / Stepping: Two gateways / 19-22
This has so far involved a lengthy process of eliminating the good stuff from the rubbish and creating towering crates of boxes around the house; some to be put back into the loft (to be eBay-ed at a later date), some to be 'charity-shopped' and the rest to be photographed/ put onto eBay/ sent in post.
here and there. Show me.
Level 1: Accuracy: +20, Speed: +7, Jump: +2.
Dear Ms. Ruth
Matchbook is like when the hipster decided preppy and girly was cool and maybe got married (or is about to get married or maybe will be a single gal forever and that's cool too!) and had a bunch of hipster but preppy kids and now it's time to decorate and throw a party. Yay! So super fun, and HELLO Jonathan Adler is on the cover so sign me up.
Since so many bloggers wanted to show their love and appreciation for our fellow educators, the event will be divided up between three "host" websites:
Natives seeking to take legal action over the logging and plantation of their Native Customary Lands in Sri Aman have now discovered that the busy Mrs Masing has also had her finger in the pie of this lucrative enterprise.
Bulgarian Chicken
She noticed some rabbit droppings on the porch and in a very serious little 5 year old voice, she said,
Life for Jon and I is pretty much the same. Work is going well for both of us and alternating work days seems to be working out for the most part we just have limited time to spend with one another. One exciting thing for us has been we recently purchased a treadmill and set up and area in our basement to exercise. I have really enjoyed being able to exercise more especially while William is napping. I'm hoping by summer time I can be in better shape to run a couple of races again.
Anthony was married to Francoise and lived on the Thula Thula game reserve in Zululand. He has two sons and two grandsons.
You do not have to let it get as bad as I did, but if you already have, it is still not too late. Make an appointment with a psychiatrist or a trained therapist. They will help you and they are morally and legally bound to keep your private business private unless you are actively homicidal or suicidal.
It also showed, through ritual and liturgy, the holiness of what every mother (and father of course) does day in and day out– oftentimes hurriedly, exhaustedly, or unattentively, they bathe their children. They clean them up after a long and dirty day and send them to bed, or they wash them in the morning in preparation of facing the day. They care for them and attend to them. And it is Christ-like. In the rush and rhythm of everyday life, maybe we don’t notice this. Maybe it’s just something that has to get done, just one more thing. But it is holy.
So when writing romance pitch copy, the real focus needs to be on the elements that make this romance original. Hard to do since all romances have a hero, a heroine, a conflict that impedes the romance and of course, a happy ending.
In a written statement read by its vice-president Khairul Azmi bin Saipul, 9, the OKC said that “they had made obedience ‘in’ long before before the OWC was even conceptualised”, and that it wasn’t a “friggin’ big deal”, referring to the Obedient Wives Club, an organisation allegedly put together by former members of Al-Arqam, a banned religious cult and business entity in Malaysia.
Glimmer Mist
♥ OPI Nicki Minaj Nail Polish in Pink Friday.
1. used to say “the thing is” when describing or explaining something. Pasa que no tengo plata para ir, así que… The thing is, I don´t have any money to go, so…
The larger picture frame was one that I already had and the smaller one I found in the dollar section at Michael's. I spray painted both white to go with my theme. The pedestal for the birds nest is a cake stand that I've turned upside down and the nest itself is reindeer moss that was leftover from a Halloween wreath project and some eggs that I found at Tuesday Morning.
Rafting, kayaking, climbing 14ers, paddle boarding, mountain biking…sold yet? Outside in Aspen brings top athletes to the mountain town for 10 adventure clinics suitable for people of all skill levels. Along the way, there is live music, demos, an après ski party, a photo workshop…again, I could go on.
I'm talking about the moms judging moms war.
In a plastic bag, forcing me to maneuver
Chums of Chance say Gravity
Who doesn't like these 4 things? (Ok, well I must admit that #2 can be a deal breaker for some of my friends, um I mean acquaintances, no really, friends) Seriously, my first call for an invite was to a dear friend of mine who I knew was kind of if-y about the whole cookie swap thing but I thought what the heck it is the holiday season, maybe that will get her to cooking, because she is a fabulous cook when she does it and the response I got was "Do you know who you are talking to? Um! No, I do not bake" (I do not bake here or there I do not bake anywhere, sorry I had to do that!!)
Now, in many units the executive engineer is a diploma holder and his assistant engineers and junior engineers are graduates and post-graduates. At the moment, the CPWD has around 800 degree holder assistant engineers who also have experience.
In the world of elite track and field, there are three basic goals: World gold, Olympic gold, and World Records. These are the achievements that most athletes would like to have before the sun sets on their careers.
(12-23-30)
“To be honest,” Robert says, “it’s thrown everything up in the air as he was going to do all the social networking etc. He has the Twitter account for a comedy club The Comedy Closet I am starting in central London. His Facebook is gone, I can’t ring him as he is in prison and I do not know exactly his circumstances. I have created some funny video sketches and set up all sorts of stuff and now I just don’t know really. I suppose I am going to have to teach myself Twitter in the space of a week.”
Across the Pennines in Leeds, a bi-election opens an opportunity for Lucy Sayers, a radical new-look nationalist candidate to win a seat in parliament. Rachel Lancaster, a legal researcher skilled in exposing corruption in local institutions, is suspicious of how far Sayers is prepared to go, to win.
Peel two of the apples, core and cut into chunks. Core the third apple and cut into thin rings, peel left on.
The beer is called 25 to One.
All of the Avengers are well realized on screen, with all getting good screen time and plenty of moments to show their mettle. Iron Man is the big cheese in this movie, but Cap gets lots of great stuff to do and Thor swinging his hammer is a treat I never expected to see on the big screen. Seeing the Big Three together was the big thrill of the movie.
Preheat grill
The creative space is coming along slowly but surely. I am loving my sewing table with all it's cubbies!
Finally, if travel counts for anything in a film title, then this year’s winner should be Midnight in Paris.
“Section 8A has been used to persecute and punish the Opposition. It has not been used against all publications that write false news.”
So having more objectively considered which features will best suit my needs, and after much experimentation and consideration, I have decided to switch to Family Historian.
The new share issue is doing well, and with payday fast approaching they are hoping for a further boost then. He was asking for ideas for what we want to do at the AGM in November. We came up with a good one. I'll let James announce it. All I'm saying is bring your wellies.
01 Shadow of a Doubt
In any case, most of the prayers were not recited with sincerity if you consider the fact that they were said in a foreign language that didn’t quite make sense to many of us. “Surely goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my life, and I will dwell in the house of the LORD forever” became “Shirley, Goodness and Mercy”. Girls with the names Shirley, Goodness or Mercy suddenly thought they were the best thing since sliced bread. They featured in one of the Lord’s prayers, after all!
This recipe (from How to Cook Everything) is fairly easy, and the results smell and taste a lot like lasagna (yay!), but without the hassle of boiling/wrangling noodles or the long bake time. The original recipe calls for sauteed ground meat, which you could do if you want, but the way I made it was all vegetables (plus chickpeas and cheese), and it was very filling and satisfying. In the original Bittman recipe he implies that you can used cooked leftover... anything in this (meat or vegetable), and I'm inclined to agree. Also he says it can be assembled up to a day in advance before baking, which is helpful.
I'm inclined to agree. I have been one of those terrible people that you question your following of for the past week - absolutely no posts.
I can't wait for 2012 to get here, so I can get to work! How about you? Do you have any UFO's creeping around your sewing room? Care to join us?
Incidentally, Tblisi also literally means “warm spring”. According to legend, the present-day territory of Tbilisi was once covered by forests and King Vakhtang I Gorgasali went hunting in these woods with a falcon. The King’s falcon was trying to catch a pheasant during the hunt when both birds fell into a nearby hot spring. King Vakhtang became so impressed when both birds got cooked in the hot springs that he decided to cut down the forest and build a city on the location. The name ‘Tbili’ or ‘Tbilisi’ (‘warm location’) was therefore given to the city because of the area’s numerous sulphuric hot springs that came out of the ground.
Judith is an incredibly motivated and driven young woman, with numerous awards and nominations to prove it. And the secret to her success; a deep-rooted sense of self-belief. To Judith the most important thing you can do when setting out in business, before knowing about cash flow, or technical skills or even the techniques behind what you are selling, is a true belief in yourself and what you want. Without it you wont get very far.
